0
"Location, Location, Location - 1372 Peachtree is three floors of awesome office space in a brand-new WeWork building in Midtown Atlanta, which is conveniently located across from the Midtown Arts Marta Station"
Competitive compensation with incentive opportunities
"Benefits include: Medical, Dental, Vision and Commuter"
Becoming an integral part of a winning team surrounded by bright teammates
Supportive leadership that recognizes and rewards outstanding performance
Small company culture where everyone’s contribution matters and is valued
Ability to participate in a constant offering and variety of lunch and learns along with departmental cross training
Casual work environment and team outings
"Experience joining a company at a high-growth, inflection point and being a part of building something special"
Collaborate with product management and engineering groups to develop new products and features
Able to identify customers' needs and desires by specifying the research needed to obtain market information
"Deliver informative and effective findings, results and recommendations from machine learning models to stakeholders"
Create dashboards of important statistics and metrics
Develop and implement scalable and efficient modeling algorithms that can work with large-scale data in production systems
"Develop predictive models to address various business problems by leveraging advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques."
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science or relevant technical fields.
"Proficient in one or more programming languages such as Python, Java, C and etc."
"Familiar with one or more machine learning or statistics tools/packages such as R, SciKitLearn, SparkML(MLlib), Tensorflow and etc."
"Knowledge and experience of machine learning, statistical modeling, or AI techniques"
Knowledge and experience of relational databases and SQL
Strong analytical and quantitative problem-solving ability.
"Experience with big data techniques (such as Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark)"
Knowledge of cloud platforms (such as AWS or Azure) and experience of developing applications on the cloud platforms using various cloud services
"Atlanta, GA 30309"
United States
"Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets"
Identifying/developing appropriate machine learning/data mining/text mining techniques to resolve entities and create relationships
Prototyping tools and techniques to solve complex data problems
Developing data driven models to quantify the value of a given data set
"Applying, modifying and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems"
Validating entity resolution and linking capabilities
Conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting process and performance measurements
"3-5 Years' Experience in SQL/HiveQL, Python, Scala, Elasticsearch,"
Experienced with advanced entity techniques and linking capabilities
Bachelor's Degree
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Equifax in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Work with stakeholders in Quality Assurance and throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive services and process improvement solutions
Provide meaningful data analyses and reports to field operations leadership to assist in service evaluation
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product and process performance
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize client experiences
Coordinate with different teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
"Initiate and participate in projects in the area of prediction, optimization, and processes using advanced statistical / mathematical approaches"
Implement most recent algorithms and approaches for machine learning in collaboration with our researchers
Design best architecture and select the most appropriate modeling techniques and data visualization for big data analysis
"Iteratively test, refine and improve the models"
"Conduct research and make recommendations on data mining products, protocols, services, and standards in support of procurement and development efforts."
Learn quickly new mathematical or technical methods
"Ph.D. or MS in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Applied Math or related quantitative topics"
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
"Experience in statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining practice"
"Experience in SQL, relational databases, database concepts, dimensional modeling and database design"
"Proficient in one or more programming languages such as Java, C++, Python, JavaScript"
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability
"Excellent communication, relationship skills and a strong team player"
Experience with BI softwares
Proficient in STATA
STATA: 2 years
Statistical modeling and data mining: 2 years
BI softwares: 2 years
"SQL, relational databases, and database design: 2 years"
"Programming languages such as Java, C++, Python, JavaScript: 2 years"
Master's
"Atlanta, GA"
United States
"Graduate degree in Engineering, Science or related field at an accredited college or university"
1+ yrs of experience in developing Data Science solutions.
1+ yrs of experience in any of the following Data Science technologies:
"Application, statistical, conceptual, mathematical, modeling, and predictive analytic expertise"
System/Data Integration
"High level programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, C++ or Java)"
Machine Learning Algorithms
"Data mining (including data auditing, aggregation, validation and reconciliation)"
Cloud Computing
Data Visualization/Presentation
Impeccable integrity
"Experience in working with Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, HBase and other big data technologies"
"Experience in working with ETL tools such as Informatica, Talend and/or Pentaho."
Good understanding of cluster and parallel architecture as well as high-scale or distributed RDBMS and/or knowledge on NoSql platforms.
"Familiarity and experience in the automotive industry around bus communications, electronic control units, embedded software, powertrain, engine, and control"
Excellent oral and written communication
Ability to embrace the philosophy of taking 100% responsibility for delivering results
The ability to work in a team environment
Familiarity and experience with software deployment and support
Superior presentation and communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to operate effectively in an international functional matrix organizational structure
Relocation Provided
Continued Professional Development
Some Travel Required
Job ID: req149533
Category: Engineering
"Location: 715 Peachtree Street, N.E., Atlanta, GA 30308 USA"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Honeywell in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Curious: You enjoy peeling apart a problem and examining the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated.
"Creative: You constantly invent and try new approaches to solving problems, which often times have never been applied in such contexts before."
Practical: You explore theories with an eye to the real world application to the business and the potential for improving performance for clients and customers.
"Focused: You're intent on designing and testing a technique over periods of days and weeks, discovering what is successful and what should be optimized further. Furthermore, you learn from the failure and trying again."
"Determined: You will have both the challenge and opportunity to help design our analytical backend from the ground-up, and therefore must be comfortable as both a team member and a leader in our data science effort."
Function as Data Scientist which carries the expectation to enhance an SaaS platform that integrates both relational and non-relational databases at scale with both algorithmic logic and front-end interfaces.
Participate in product development with leadership team meetings and communicate with advisors regularly on all matters regarding insights and technology developments.
Define the software architecture of the growing data analytics capability and build substantial portions yourself.
"MS or PhD. Degree in relevant discipline (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering or Health Sciences) required."
3+ years’ experience in advanced analytics.
3+ years’ experience in a data architecture role with deep understanding of architecture principles & best practices.
Experience delivering solutions in an Agile environment.
Working knowledge of the Hadoop ecosystem (including creating and debugging)
Proficiency in fully architecting and executing complex analytical backends
"Proficiency with Node.js and SQL; Expert proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Scala/Spark, Python, et al; Expert proficiency in at least one statistical modeling program like R, MATLAB, or SAS"
"Experience in machine learning, artificial intelligence and/or artificial neural networks"
"Proficiency in applying various mathematical and statistical models to include, but not limited to: Discrete Event Simulation, Factor Analysis, Genetic Algorithms, Bayesian Probability Models, Hidden Markov Models and Sensitivity Analysis"
Ability to setup and maintain database for extremely large datasets using current database technologies (ex. Hadoop)
Strong experience in using application programming interfaces (API)
"Proficient in the big data ecosystem with familiarity with Hadoop, Yarn, Spark, and/or Storm"
"Proficient in at least one big data store, for example: hBase, Cassandra, Hive, etc."
"Demonstrated technical abilities to engineer products that large datasets, with tools that may include: Cluster computing, Grid Computing, Graphical Processing Unit Computing"
Commercial Cloud Systems such as Amazon Elastic Cloud Compute EC2
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Cotiviti in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Continue enhancing the Manheim Market Report (MMR) related products based on new feature request, clients feedback and performance benchmarking."
Leverage the vehicle build data information to provide vehicle content/option adjustment for the general MMR model.
"Analysis the Vehicle Catalog system, Vehicle Description service and Vehicle Translate system. Provide the insight analysis and data science support for these systems, at the same time, leverage these information to other products, such as the forecast MMR, VIN decoding systems."
"Introduce and implement these cutting-edge technology, innovation method and agile development system, such as the machine learning, artificial intelligence, AWS environment, etc."
Develop common APIs to deliver the solutions and make it ready to be integrated into other applications.
"Collaborate with team members to research and evaluate new valuation methodologies, approaches and solutions."
Interpret and communicate analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners and executive decision makers
Must have at least 5+ years’ experience performing advanced quantitative analyses.
Graduate degree in Applied Statistics or Applied Mathematics or other related degrees.
"Ability to manipulate, analyzes, and interprets terabytes of data. Ability to organize findings and translate into actionable insights using original or innovative techniques or style."
"Ability to apply advanced statistical methodologies such as sampling theory, design of experiments, regression, analysis of variance, correlation techniques, and factor analysis."
"Must have intermediate to advanced experience in Statistical Language Software (e.g. R, SAS) and database applications."
"Must have intermediate or advanced experience in General Language Software (e.g. Python), and AWS experience are preferred."
Must have relational database experience (e.g. SQL).
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data
"Demonstrated experience in organizing, prioritizing, and coordinating complex team efforts"
AWS experience
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Cox Automotive in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Leverage Big Data to discover patterns and solve strategic and tactical business problems using massive structured and unstructured data sets across multiple environments
Understand customer business use cases and be able to translate them to analytical data applications and models with a vision on how to implement a solution
Develop tools to analyze data accuracy and model performance
"Leverage machine learning, natural language processing, and/or advanced statistical techniques"
Research industry topics impacting opportunities relevant for data analysis projects
"Coordinate across teams (product management, engineering, etc.) timely and effectively"
"Strong knowledge/experience with data science pipeline and analytics tools such as Python, R, matlab, octane, clojure, tensorflow, keras, or other AI frameworks"
"In-depth understanding of data scrubbing, database management, statistics, and machine learning"
Organized and capable of independently managing complex analytical projects from start to finish
"Excellent interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills"
"Strong, out-of-the-box thinking, and a curious mind"
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
At least 3+ years of overall analytics experience
"Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or another quantitative field"
"Ability to work full-time, onsite in our Sandy Springs office"
"Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or another quantitative field"
"4+ years of experience in consulting with emphasis on specializing in forecasting, linear programming, or machine learning"
Competitive salary and health benefits
Paid company holidays and up to 15 days of PTO
"Complimentary perks such as an onsite gym, free snacks, and monthly catered lunches"
analytics: 3 years
Bachelor's
"Atlanta, GA"
United States
"Effectively utilize statistical, data mining, and machine learning techniques, and computer science skills in delivering advanced analytics and decision support systems."
Collaborates with various departments to identify opportunities for process improvement and developing analytics use-cases.
"Advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms, e.g. gradient boosting, random forests, neural networks, SVMs"
"Advanced statistical techniques, e.g. Bayesian, sampling and experimental design"
Excellent knowledge in R and/or Python
"Knowledge of big data and Hadoop-stack technologies, especially: Spark (preferably pyspark) and Hive"
Knowledge of SQL and relational databases
Experience with sensor/signal data is a plus
Experience with image processing and Deep Learning is a plus
Planning and Organizing
Identifying and Considering Alternatives
Analytical Thinking
Communication Skills
Initiative
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Norfolk Southern in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at The Coca-Cola Company in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
5-7 years of Data Modeling and Machine Learning Experience
5-7 years of Python & R- Language Experience
5-7 years of HADOOP-BIGDATA experience
Proficiency dealing with extraction and manipulation of relational databases (SQL)
"3 -5 years of experience in advanced statistical techniques such as predictive statistical models, customer profiling, segmentation analysis survey design and analysis and data mining"
3-5 years of experience of learning systems to analyze and filter continuous data flows.
3-5 years of experience of analyzing large data sets to develop custom models and algorithms to drive business solutions.
3-5 years of experience building large data sets from multiple sources to build algorithms for predicting future data characteristics.
Experience developing custom data models to drive recommendations.
Experience working in a cross-functional environment.
Excellent Communication Skills
Good Team Player
Able to work independently with minimum guidance
"Data Scientist jobs in Johns Creek, GA"
"Jobs at SoftVision in Johns Creek, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Johns Creek, GA"
Understand the customer’s business need and guide them to a solution using Amazon ML and AI services
"Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML/DL project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models to deliver business impact to the organization"
"Use Deep Learning frameworks like MXNet, Caffe 2, Tensorflow, Theano, CNTK, and Keras to help our customers build DL models"
Use SparkML and Amazon Machine Learning (AML) to help our customers build ML models
Assist customers with identifying model drift and retraining models
"Research and implement novel ML and DL approaches, including using FPGA"
"A Bachelor's or Master's Degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent experience"
Previous experience in a ML or data scientist role and a track record of building ML or DL models
Experience using Python and/or R
Knowledge of SparkML
"Able to write production level code, which is well-written and explainable"
Experience using ML libraries
Experience working with GPUs to develop models
Experience handling terabyte size datasets
Track record of diving into data to discover hidden patterns
Familiarity with using data visualization tools
Knowledge and experience of writing and tuning SQL
"Graduate degree (BS or M.S. required,) in a quantitative discipline"
3 to 5 years professional experience building predictive and descriptive models
"Good experience with statistical packages in Python, R, or SAS"
Experience with Data Visualization using tools like Tableau
Experience in statistical and data mining techniques
Understanding of RDBMs and interactive SQL programming skills
"Experience with Big Data technologies like Hadoop, Spark, Hive, NoSQL, etc., and Cloud technologies (AWS, Azure, etc) preferred"
Good communication and presentation skills
"Builds, maintains, and improves complex key decision systems and predictive models"
Explores both internal and external new data sources and utilizes findings to further improve and optimize model performance
"Designs, implements, and reads in-market experiments testing new algorithms, technologies, and processes"
"Recommends and supports strategic business changes through rigorous analytics, deep understanding of the business, and creative problem solving"
"Identifies, evaluates, and implements emerging advanced analytics technologies and methods"
Uses data visualization techniques to effectively communicate analytical results and support business decisions
"Master’s degree in a quantitative or technical field (Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, Business Analytics, Data Science or a related field)"
Experience with implementation of machine learning models using web services preferred
Possesses skills in data exploration and machine learning tools such as those found in R and/or Python
Microsoft Azure platform skills preferred
Demonstrated ability applying advanced statistical modeling techniques to solve problems
"Intermediate skills with querying languages (SQL, etc.)"
"Demonstrates proficiency in several areas of data modeling, machine learning algorithms, statistical modeling & analysis, data engineering and data visualization"
Effectively resolves problems and roadblocks as they occur
Ability to communicate and present highly complex concepts to all levels of management
"Data Scientist jobs in Kennesaw, GA"
"Jobs at Aaron's in Kennesaw, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Kennesaw, GA"
"Associate Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Inspire Brands in Atlanta, GA"
"Associate Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Apply advanced statistical techniques and concepts to analyze data from the company database (PostgreSQL), with Salesforce, and other unstructured data sources to drive optimization and improvement of product features, marketing messaging, and internal business processes"
Develop custom data models/algorithms
Develop tools to analyze data accuracy and model performance
"Leverage machine learning, natural language processing, and/or advanced statistical techniques"
"Coordinate across teams (product management, engineering, etc) timely and effectively"
Possess a drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
"Contribute to the rapid growth of the research organization, being flexible in data engineering, algorithmist, and analyst responsibilities as they arise"
"Masters or PhD in CS, Mathematics, Statistics, or another quantitative field"
"Experience with machine learning, including natural language processing, probabilistic reasoning, and neural networks. Background in contemporary machine learning techniques, such as deep/differential learning, preferred."
"Strong knowledge/experience with a variety of analysis tools, including Python, R, and SQL"
"Background in information retrieval, data mining, and ETL techniques for processing data"
Experience working cross-organization to service the data analysis needs of different parts of the business
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at SalesLoft in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Proven statistical/mathematical and analytical skills; coursework in Machine Learning and statistics
Proficiency in R and/or Python
Knowledge of a general programming language like C++ or Java is a plus
"Knowledge of one or more of the following: Gradient Boosting Machines, Random Forests, Neural Networks, or other classification or regression models"
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Ability to work in a team environment as well as working independently
"Pursuing a Master’s/PhD DegreePreferred Degree Paths: Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Management Science and Statistics, and majors in a similar field of study"
"Preferred Degree Paths: Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Management Science and Statistics, and majors in a similar field of study"
"Freshman (27 or fewer credits) - $2,500/month"
"Sophomore (28 to 59 credits) - $2,800/month"
"Junior (60 to 89 credits) - $3,000 /month"
"Senior (90 or more credits) - $3,300/month"
"Graduate Student - $3,666/month"
Living stipend of $850/month is available to those who qualify.
"Jobs at Norfolk Southern in Atlanta, GA"
"Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets"
Identifying/developing appropriate machine learning/data mining/text mining techniques to resolve entities and create relationships
Prototyping tools and techniques to solve complex data problems
Developing data driven models to quantify the value of a given data set
"Applying, modifying and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems"
Validating entity resolution and linking capabilities
Conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting process and performance measurements
"Bachelor's required, Master's preferred"
"Advanced degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math or other quantitative fields"
"A minimum of 7+ years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling"
Strong business acumen
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish
Ability to independently support existing products
Proven track record in modifying and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems
Experience with graph and probabilistic technology
Proven ability to work independently on development of complex models with extremely large and complex data structures
"Proficient in more than one of SQL, Python, R, Java, C++, C, Elastic Search and Solr"
Robust knowledge and experience with statistical methods and hypothesis testing
"Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as Map Reduce, Spark, Hive, Pig, HBase, mongoDB, Cassandra, etc."
"Experience with transforming large sets of structured, semi structured and unstructured data into useable information"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Equifax in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Interact with partners, customer business and analytics teams to capture the business requirement"
"Extract data from a variety of relational databases, manipulate, explore data using quantitative, statistical and visualization tools."
Develop statistical approach for generating insights from structured and unstructured customer product data
Develop and deploy machine learning /statistical solutions for pricing recommendations and translate the analytics finding in form of easy to comprehend actionable insights
"Determine machine learning methodologies; apply such methodologies (e.g. collaborative filtering, matrix factorization, SVMs, Bayesian methods, etc.) on product, pricing & location data etc."
Design and develop reports and dashboards to present the output of analytics modelling - Proactively recommend and execute strategies to grow the relevant services in existing account and target customers/industries
Play an advisory role to customers and prospects and provide thought leadership & execution direction
"Have hands on experience on leading analytics solutions and tools like such as R(preferred), SAP Predictive Analytics, Python etc. to develop solutions and also explore new emerging machine learning and AI libraries like Tensor flow, Caffe2 etc."
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Hiscox in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"3+ years of experience using advanced analytical techniques to solve business problems or 2+ years of experience with a graduate degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Management Science or relevant area or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Management Science or relevant area"
Advanced Excel skills with a focus on formula development and model building
"Advanced database query experience, either using SQL architecture or noSQL architecture"
Advanced R or Python programming skills for data manipulation and analysis
"Demonstrated background in quantitative analysis, especially concepts related to statistical and/or machine learning analysis. Excellent working knowledge of time series based modeling techniques is essential"
Ability to multi-task and communicate effectively across teams in a deadline-driven atmosphere
"Experience with cloud-based computing, UNIX, and/or digital marketing is preferred but not required"
"Numerate degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Management Science, or relevant area (graduate degree preferred)"
"Senior Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Leverage Big Data to discover patterns and solve strategic and tactical business problems using massive structured and unstructured data sets across multiple environments.
Develop analytic capabilities (e.g. models and processes) that drive better outcomes for both customers and the company.
"Drive the collection, cleansing, processing and analysis of new and existing data sources."
Research industry topics impacting opportunities relevant for data analysis projects.
Executes complex analyses to aid in reporting and interpretation of analytical findings to build a comprehensive solution.
Demonstrates good judgment and analytical skills to conduct option analysis and present recommendations
Support and resolve issues related to analyses or deliverables in production
"Works with internal and external clients to understand, clarify, and analyze requirements to understand the business, and potential, impactful solutions"
Mapping of processes to understand opportunities for advanced analytics and product enhancement
"BA or BS degree in business analysis, computer science, economics, data science or Masters preferred."
5+ years of overall analytics experiencePredictive AnalyticsStatistical modelingMachine Learning is a plus
Predictive Analytics
Statistical modeling
Machine Learning is a plus
"Expert level understanding of analytics tools and languages (i.e. R, Python, or C++, etc.)"
"Experience in business analysis, requirements definition"
"Proven and recent experience working with Sales, Marketing, Supply Chain, and/or Manufacturing Data"
"Ability to navigate and access structured and unstructured data environments (ie. Hadoop, Oracle, SQL, etc.)"
Experience utilizing internal and external data sources to identify otherwise hidden industry trends to impact product development.
Exposure to visualization tools such as Tableau / Qliksense
Must be solutions-oriented and focused on innovation
"Familiarity with a scripting language: e.g. Perl, Python or a programming language: e.g. Java."
"Self-motivated, highly organized with the ability to multitask and prioritize workload."
Natural curiosity and passion for problem solving
Consultative communication skillset; comfortable with working with senior management level personnel both inside and outside the organization
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Interface in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Develop business requirements for a Supply Chain data repository to consolidate multiple ERP data sources into a comprehensive source for analytics
Partner with the IT organization on the development and implementation of algorithms required to extract and cleanse data into the Supply Chain data repository
Develop and implement diagnostic tools for use by business users to identify performance oppourtunities and root cause for action planning
Develop and implement optimization programs to improve planning outputs for manufacturing and distribution operations
"MS in Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering"
5+ years experience developing and applying statistical and operations techniques within a business environment
Ability to communicate complex technical concepts to business partners in Supply Chain and Finance communiites.
Expert level SQL skills with demonstrated experience with large data sets.
"Advanced experince with data visualization tools like Tableau, QlikView, Qlik Sense, etc., deploying BI tools at scale"
Intermediate experience in open source programming languages (R/Python)
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Interpersonally savvy
Ability to work with and connect with all levels of employees
Strong planning & organizing skills
"Initiative & follow-up, including a strong sense of autonomy"
Strong Character – ability to champion the right decision in difficult situations
Demonstrated ability to handle multiple tasks and assignments simultaneously
"Business Intelligence Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Newell Brands in Atlanta, GA"
"Business Intelligence Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at HD Supply in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Design and implement AI powered models for medical diagnosis.
Combine medical imaging models into traditional big data analysis for healthcare.
Translate new technologies into product solutions for improved clinical care
Collaborate with clinicians and customers to address unmet clinical needs
Master's degree or above in Math/Statistics/Computer Science or related fields with working experience. Fresh Ph.D. graduates are welcomed to apply.
Candidates with solid background in image processing /computer vision or related areas are preferred.
"Strong experience in deep learning and computer vision, including designing and"
"Knowledge of Linux programming in python, familiar with at least one of the popular deep learning frameworks, such as tensorflow, keras and caffe."
"Experience of parallel programming, GPU programming, especially in CUDA, is a plus."
Experience of medical imaging processing with deep learning is preferred.
Good communication skill and strong team player.
Master's
Initiate and participate in data mining and reporting
Audit and profile the data to assess the impact of poor quality data on the organization’s performance and impacts.
Conduct A/B testing based on different hypotheses that directly and indirectly impact operational key performance indicators.
Create and support data visualization through operational and executive dashboards.
"Import/Collect, clean, convert and analyze data for the purpose of find insights and making conclusions."
Design and develop relational databases for collecting data.
Monitor the performance of data systems and if there are any issues then respond to the same.
"Keep a track of trends, patterns and correlation in case of complex data sets."
Prepare concise data reports and data visualizations for the management that will help in decision-making process.
Assist the data scientist in development of new analytical tools and methods as and when required.
Bachelor’s Degree
Two or more years as a data analyst in related field
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in basic statistical modeling and reporting
"Experience in SQL, relational databases, database concepts, dimensional modeling and database design"
"Proficient in one or more programming languages: R, Python, STATA, SAS"
"Experience with Caseworthy, SQL and Tableau"
data analyst in related field: 2 years
basic statistical modeling and reporting: 2 years
"Programming languages: R, Python, STATA, SAS: 2 years"
"SQL, relational databases, database concepts/design: 2 years"
"Caseworthy, SQL and Tableau: 1 year"
Bachelor's
"Atlanta, GA"
Develop both descriptive and predictive models to help solve real-world industry problems
"Using the results of analysis and modeling, the Data Scientist must effectively communicate impactful business recommendations on a regular basis"
Apply machine learning and data mining techniques to identify growth opportunities
"Build solutions for but not limited to: customer segmentation and targeting, propensity modeling, churn modeling, lifetime value estimation, forecasting, recommendation systems, modeling response to incentives, and price optimization"
"Identify and validate industry Key Performance Indicators (KPIs), metrics, and trends"
Transform and manipulate data in preparation for analysis
Provide testing techniques and methodologies in order to assess the impact and effectiveness of business initiatives
Keep up-to-date on relevant tools and algorithms
"Master’s degree in a field with significant quantitative training (e.g. applied statistics, mathematics, economics, finance, computer science, engineering)"
Previous experience with retail CPG analytics is a plus
Fluency in R and/or Python
"2+ years of experience in supervised and unsupervised machine learning methods including but not limited to clustering techniques (e.g. k-means, DBSCAN, spectral clustering), tree-based ensemble classifiers (random forests, gradient-boosted trees), support vector machines, and neural networks"
"Familiarity with: general linear modeling, simulation, feature engineering and selection, hyperparameter tuning, cross-validation, data smoothing methods, ARIMA models, Box-Jenkins methodology, multivariate time series analysis"
Knowledge of SQL with the ability to independently write queries in order to extract necessary data
Organized and capable of independently managing complex analytical projects from start to finish
Ability to independently structure analyses and communicate findings to a non-technical audience
"Experience with Excel VBA/macros, Tableau, and/or Alteryx is a plus"
"Data Scientist jobs in Alpharetta, GA"
"Jobs at Scientific Games in Alpharetta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Alpharetta, GA"
"Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or Applied Mathematics"
"PhD degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related field"
Strong Data Science prototyping experience (Python and/or R tool-stack)
Machine Learning experience of physical systems
Experience with distributed storage and compute tools (e.g. Hive and Spark)
Experience bringing prototypes to production on Hadoop platforms and/or as containerized services.
Experience with Streaming Analytics (i.e. Spark Streaming)
Experience with Recurrent Neural Network architectures
Experience with Natural Language Processing
Experience with Image Analytics
Experience with SQL
Experience with Tableau
Experience working with remote and global teams
Results driven with a positive can do attitude
Continued Professional Development
Job ID: HRD30620
Category: Engineering
"Location: 715 Peachtree Street, N.E., Atlanta, GA 30308 USA"
"Advanced Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Honeywell in Atlanta, GA"
"Advanced Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Master's in Computer Science, Math or related quantitative field (or BS/BA in Computer Science, Math or related quantitative field and 5 years of data mining experience)."
"Work experience with Hadoop, SAS, HBASE, Cassandra or other similar development platforms."
Expert knowledge in large-scale information retrieval and statistical analysis.
Ability to build scalable systems that analyze huge data sets and make actionable recommendations
Strong communication and data presentation skills
"Ability to quickly adapt to new technologies, tools, and techniques"
"Flexible and responsive; able to perform in a fast-paced, dynamic work environment and meet aggressive deadlines"
Ability to work with technical and non-technical team members
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at The Home Depot in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Independently lead data science projects and deliver innovative technical solutions to solve problems and improve business outcomes.
Lead the design and development of machine learning/statistical models and ensure best performance.
Work closely with engineers to deploy models in production both in real time and in batch process and systematically track model performance.
Assist engagement with key business stakeholders in discussion on business strategies and opportunities.
Build strong working relationship and develop deep partnership with the business.
Be a subject matter expert on machine learning and predictive modeling.
"Drive technical innovation through active research and applications of new theories, techniques, and technologies."
Bachelor’s degree or four or more years of work experience.
Four or more years of relevant work experience.
Master’s degree in a quantitative field or equivalent.
"A Ph.D. in statistics, Math, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Data Science or a related field."
5+ years of experience in practicing machine learning and data science in business.
"Solid foundational quantitative knowledge and skills; extensive training in math, statistics, physical science, engineering, or other related fields."
Experience in leading data science projects and delivering from end to end.
Strong technical expertise in machine learning and statistical modeling.
"Strong hands on computing/programming skills; proficiency in Python, R, and Linux shell script."
Expertise in data management and data analysis in relational database and in Hadoop.
Strong communication and interpersonal influencing skills.
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking capabilities.
Experience with NLP and chatbot technology.
"Experience with Spark, C++, scala, or Java is preferred; familiarity with SAS."
Strong expertise in SQL and database management.
"Data Scientist jobs in Alpharetta, GA"
"Jobs at Verizon in Alpharetta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Alpharetta, GA"
"Contribute to creation of roadmaps for data science domain ensuring alignment to Travelport Technology and Business Strategies and drive deployment of the best data science solutions to enable delivery of operational goals for system efficiencies, cost optimization and customer availability."
Leads efforts in artificial intelligence to achieve high quality deliverables that exceed customer expectations.
Contribute to thought leadership and drive the execution of diverse data science projects through proactive collaboration with the data science community within Travelport.
Accountability for follow through on design and delivery of assigned aspects of roadmaps.
Have the ability to discover new opportunities where advanced analytical techniques can be leveraged for solving business problems.
"Uses business acumen to understand what drives the organization, which factors influence strategy, and how the data can contribute to measuring the success of our strategic initiatives."
Provides business metrics for the overall project to show improvements (contribution to the improvement should be monitored initially and over multiple iterations).
Leads the evaluation of data technologies.
Leads the development of proofs of concept.
"Delivers complex statistical and machine learning/predictive models from both internal and external data to provide solutions, insights, and new opportunities for business and product."
Proactively identify improvement opportunities through systematic and rigorous measurement and analysis.
Performs tests based on different hypotheses to directly and indirectly impact different Key Performance Indicators.
Communicate analytical results in a way that is meaningful for business stakeholders and provides actionable insights.
Converses with and creates/delivers presentations to internal business leaders and as well as external groups.
"Develops usage and access control policies and systems in collaboration with COE Architecture, data governance and data & analytics resources and partner in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case."
Remain a subject matter expert in emerging data science practices and technologies and share emerging best practice and innovation with Travelport data science community.
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field required; Advanced degree preferred [Masters preferred]
10+ years experience in Statistics and Quantitative Analysis. Highly advanced domain expertise and experience working across a diverse group of products/applications and related systems identifying key inter-dependencies
"Good knowledge of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel PowerPoint) Visio as applicable."
Practical comprehensive knowledge of using Microsoft Project / PPM as a planning tool and working in a Project Server Environment
Technical skills dependent on role and will range as below;
Advanced knowledge of DBMS query languages
"Expert knowledge of at least one programming language (R, Python, Java, Weka, NumPy)"
Working knowledge of additional languages expected.
"Expert knowledge of statistical software packages (R, SAS, SPSS)"
Advanced knowledge of big data technologies such as Spark or Hadoop
"Advanced knowledge of data visualization tools such as GGplot, Qlikview, etc."
Intermediate knowledge of machine learning and deep learning framework
Masters Degree in Statistics or related field; prefer a PHD
"Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, or Pig"
"Experience with NoSQL databases, such as Elastic Search, MongoDB, CouchDB, Cassandra, or HBase"
"Great applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, or regression"
"Good scripting and programming skills in Python, Perl, Java, C++, or Scala"
Relevant experience in Big Data platforms like Hadoop and its eco-system
"Senior Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Travelport in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Quickly understand client needs, develop solutions, and articulate findings to client executives."
Provide data-driven recommendations to clients by clearly articulating complex technical concepts through generation and delivery of presentations.
Analyze and model both structured and unstructured data from a number of distributed client and publicly available sources.
Perform EDA and feature engineering to both inform the development of statistical models and generate improve model performance and flexibility.
Design and build scalable machine learning models to meet the needs of given client engagement.
0-2 year(s) professional work experience as a data scientist or on advanced analytics / statistics projects.
"Master’s degree from top tier college/university in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, or other closely related field."
PhD preferred.
"Strong understanding and application of statistical methods and skills: distributions, experimental design, variance analysis, A/B testing, and regression."
"Statistical emphasis on data mining techniques, Bayesian Networks Inference, CHAID, CART, association rule, linear and non-linear regression, hierarchical mixed models/multi-level modeling, and ability to answer questions about underlying algorithms and processes."
Experience with both Bayesian and frequentist methodologies.
"Mastery of statistical software, scripting languages, and packages (e.g. R, Matlab, SAS, Python, Pearl, Scikit-learn, Caffe, SAP Predictive Analytics, KXEN, ect.)."
"Knowledge of or experience working with database systems (e.g. SQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Postgres, ect.)"
"Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems (e.g. S3, EC2, Hadoop/MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Spark, SAP HANA, ect.)"
"Expertise in machine learning algorithms and experience using the following ML techniques: Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Gradient Boosting, SVMs, Time Series, KMeans, Clustering, NMF)."
"Preferred experience with NLP, Graph Theory, Neural Networks (RNNs/CNNs), sentiment analysis, and Azure ML."
Experience building scalable data pipelines and with data engineering/ feature engineering.
Preferred experience with web-scrapping.
Experience building and deploying predictive models.
Experience with PowerPoint and ability to clearly articulate findings and present solutions.
Excellent team-oriented and interpersonal skills.
"Qualifications: 1-4 years experience, Bachelor’s Degree."
"Should have progressing skills in Software Engineering Techniques, Software Engineering Architecture, Software Engineering Lifecycle and Data Management."
"Should have baseline skills in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design."
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Capgemini in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Delta Air Lines in Atlanta, GA"
0064382_P0223181
Design and develop algorithms and models to use against large datasets to create business insights
"Establish scalable, efficient processes for large scale data analyses, model development and model implementation"
Develops advanced heuristics and Supply Chain Analytical tools to evaluate the Supply Chain and provide solutions to identify cost drivers and increase revenue
Present analysis and resulting recommendations to Senior Leadership.; leverage data to present compelling business case to optimize Supply Chain Cost
"Master’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Advanced Analytics, Preferred 3+ years of experience in related quantitative field"
Very strong knowledge in Operations Research techniques and experienced in developing Linear and Mixed Integer programming optimization models
"Design and develop optimization algorithms/Heuristic models using advanced programming languages (like C++, Java, C#, R, Python etc) to help optimize supply chain operations."
"Strong relational database skills (Access, SQL Server, etc.) and SQL skills (Writing complex queries to pull large sets of data, performing analysis using SQL queries)"
"Strong understanding of Object Oriented Programming Language (C++, Java, C#, etc.)"
"Strong direct experience in analyzing the relevant subject matter (Supply Chain, Merchandising, Distribution, Operations)"
"Proficiency in Excel (Pivot Tables, V-Lookup, Macros, VBA, etc.) a must"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at NCR in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Effectively utilize statistical, data mining, and machine learning techniques, and computer science skills in delivering advanced analytics and decision support systems."
Collaborates with various departments to identify opportunities for process improvement and developing analytics use-cases.
"Provide guidance, support and mentoring to junior team members."
Evaluate accuracy and quality of new data sources.
Develop custom data models and algorithms.
Design and develop production ready code.
Communicate results and implications to colleagues and business partners.
Coordinate with application development teams to integrate developed models with existing applications.
"Advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms, e.g. gradient boosting, random forests, neural networks, SVMs"
"Advanced statistical techniques, e.g. Bayesian, sampling and experimental design"
Excellent knowledge in R and/or Python
"Knowledge of big data and Hadoop-stack technologies, especially: Spark (preferably pyspark) and Hive"
Knowledge of SQL and relational databases
Experience with sensor/signal data is a plus
Experience with image processing and Deep Learning is a plus
Planning and Organizing
Identifying and Considering Alternatives
Analytical Thinking
Communication Skills
Initiative
"Senior Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Norfolk Southern in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Acts as a mentor to other Data Scientists and may perform supervisory duties
"Builds, maintains, and improves highly complex key decision systems and predictive models"
Leads the exploration of both internal and external new data sources and utilizes finding to further improve and optimize model performance
"Designs, implements, and reads in-market experiments testing new algorithms, technologies, and processes"
"Recommends and supports complex strategic business changes through rigorous analytics, deep understanding of the business, and creative problem solving"
"Spearheads the identification, evaluation, and implementation of emerging advanced analytics technologies and methods"
Uses data visualization techniques to effectively communicate analytical results and support business decisions
"Master’s degree in a quantitative or technical field (Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, Business Analytics, Data Science or a related field) or equivalent work experience"
5 years of relevant experience
Experience in consumer finance and/or retail
Experience implementing machine learning models using web services
Possesses strong skills in data exploration and machine learning tools such as those found in R and/or Python
Microsoft Azure platform skills preferred
Demonstrated ability applying advanced statistical modeling techniques to solve problems
"Advanced skills with querying languages (SQL, etc.)"
"Demonstrates proficiency in several areas of data modeling, machine learning algorithms, statistical modeling & analysis, data engineering and data visualization"
Effectively resolves problems and roadblocks as they occur
Ability to communicate and present highly complex concepts to all levels of management
Strong leadership capability as well as the ability to work cross-functionally
"Data Scientist Prin Manager jobs in Kennesaw, GA"
"Jobs at Aaron's in Kennesaw, GA"
"Data Scientist Prin Manager salaries in Kennesaw, GA"
We are looking for a talented data scientist to join the CNN Research & Analytics team
This position will report directly to the Vice-President of CNN Brand & Multiplatform Research
The data scientist will be responsible for predictive modeling and analysis of audience consumption data as well as extending the analytic capabilities of the department by such means as fusing and connecting datasets and developing systems for better manipulating data
"In addition, this role will go beyond the scope of typical data science roles into a new discipline that combines data science with the domains of audience and market research"
In this capacity he/she will be involved with some of the most sophisticated research in the media industry
Analyze and model internal and external audience consumption data
Connect and fuse datasets to maximize department analytic capabilities Develop a process and tools for forecasting future audience levels across CNN's digital businesses Build relationships and collaborate with analysts and researchers across CNN and Turner
Produce statistical and machine learning models that inform our understanding of audience consumption patterns
Apply market research statistical methods such as cluster-based consumer segmentation of survey data
"Drive improvement in our methodologies, systems and processes"
"Provide analysis, reporting, and modeling to internal organizations based on multiple data sources"
"Proactively consider data, strategies, applications and analyses that address CNN research priorities"
"B.A./B.S. degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Political Science, or similar quantitative field"
Quantitative oriented Masters Degree or Ph.D preferred
Minimum of 4-5 years of experience in analytics and data science
"2+ years of experience with conducting analysis in R, Python, SAS, or similar analytical languages Experience with relational databases and SQL preferred Experience with working in cloud based environments like AWS a plus"
"Deep knowledge of a variety of statistical data mining methods including: linear and logistic regression, machine learning algorithms, experimental design and statistical graphics"
"Skilled researcher, able to distill large bodies of research to key findings and explain them to varied audiences"
Strong history of identifying opportunities for developing predictive models to meet business needs
"Basic web programming skills, including experience with API integrations for data retrieval"
Interest in and knowledge of news and the news landscape
"Experience with digital and television measurement a plus """
"Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone"
Must be able to pay close attention to complex detail and understand written and oral instructions
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively
Must be able to work well under time constraints
"Must be able to handle multiple tasks with changing priorities, communicating changes in scope and schedule to all parties concerned"
Must be able to work independently
Must be able to maintain confidentiality
Paid time off every year to volunteer
2016 Best Company for Working Mothers (Link to: http://www.workingmother.com/turner#page-2)
An in-house learning and development team to help shape and grow your career
"Senior Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Turner in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Curious: You enjoy peeling apart a problem and examining the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated.
"Creative: You constantly invent and try new approaches to solving problems, which often times have never been applied in such contexts before."
Practical: You explore theories with an eye to the real world application to the business and the potential for improving performance for clients and customers.
"Focused: You're intent on designing and testing a technique over periods of days and weeks, discovering what is successful and what should be optimized further. Furthermore, you learn from the failure and trying again."
"Determined: You will have both the challenge and opportunity to help design our analytical backend from the ground-up, and therefore must be comfortable as both a team member and a leader in our data science effort."
Function as Data Scientist which carries the expectation to enhance an SaaS platform that integrates both relational and non-relational databases at scale with both algorithmic logic and front-end interfaces.
Participate in product development with leadership team meetings and communicate with advisors regularly on all matters regarding insights and technology developments.
Define the software architecture of the growing data analytics capability and build substantial portions yourself.
"MS or PhD. Degree in relevant discipline (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering or Health Sciences) required."
3+ years’ experience in advanced analytics.
3+ years’ experience in a data architecture role with deep understanding of architecture principles & best practices.
Experience delivering solutions in an Agile environment.
Working knowledge of the Hadoop ecosystem (including creating and debugging)
Proficiency in fully architecting and executing complex analytical backends
"Proficiency with Node.js and SQL; Expert proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Scala/Spark, Python, et al; Expert proficiency in at least one statistical modeling program like R, MATLAB, or SAS"
"Experience in machine learning, artificial intelligence and/or artificial neural networks"
"Proficiency in applying various mathematical and statistical models to include, but not limited to: Discrete Event Simulation, Factor Analysis, Genetic Algorithms, Bayesian Probability Models, Hidden Markov Models and Sensitivity Analysis"
Ability to setup and maintain database for extremely large datasets using current database technologies (ex. Hadoop)
Strong experience in using application programming interfaces (API)
"Proficient in the big data ecosystem with familiarity with Hadoop, Yarn, Spark, and/or Storm"
"Proficient in at least one big data store, for example: hBase, Cassandra, Hive, etc."
"Demonstrated technical abilities to engineer products that large datasets, with tools that may include: Cluster computing, Grid Computing, Graphical Processing Unit Computing"
Commercial Cloud Systems such as Amazon Elastic Cloud Compute EC2
"Senior Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Cotiviti in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist Supply Chain jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at The Home Depot in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist Supply Chain salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Collaborates with various departments to identify opportunities for process improvement and developing analytics use-cases.
"Work closely with business partners, gather requirements, and develop deep understanding of the use-cases."
Lead a team of data scientist and senior data scientists.
"Lead and mentor junior team members on data processing, feature engineering, visualization, modeling and validation."
Evaluate accuracy and quality of new data sources and data gathering techniques. Work closely with Data Engineering group to ensure that requirements are met.
"Effectively utilize statistical, data mining, and machine learning techniques, and computer science skills in delivering advanced analytics and decision support systems."
Develop custom data models and algorithms.
Design and develop production ready code.
Coordinate with application development teams to integrate developed models with existing applications.
"Communicate results and implications to colleagues, business partners and upper management."
"Advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms, e.g. gradient boosting, random forests, neural networks, SVMs"
"Advanced statistical techniques, e.g. Bayesian, sampling and experimental design"
Excellent knowledge in R and/or Python
"Knowledge of big data and Hadoop-stack technologies, especially: Spark (preferably pyspark) and Hive"
Knowledge of SQL and relational databases
Experience with sensor/signal data is a plus
Experience with image processing and Deep Learning is a plus
Planning and Organizing
Identifying and Considering Alternatives
Analytical Thinking
Communication Skills
Initiative
"Lead Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Norfolk Southern in Atlanta, GA"
"Lead Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Lead and contribute to key technical efforts in the analysis, construction, and design of optical systems for remote sensing applications"
"Document work in memoranda, sponsor briefs, conference proceedings, and journal articles. Brief senior leadership and sponsors as required"
"Support field integration, data collection, and other testing activities at test sites and facilities (travel may be required)"
"Participate in new business development efforts by contributing to white papers, RFI/RFP responses, and sponsor briefs, and by proposing new research areas suitable for internal research and development (IR&D) funding"
"A degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering"
0-7 years of professional or graduate experience
"Candidates should have education, experience, and/or expertise in one or more of the following:Satellite/Overhead imageryGeomatics/Geospatial IntelligenceMachine learning, pattern recognition, and clusteringSensor data fusionEO/IR imaging systemsRadiometric analysisFourier opticsElectro-optical/Image signal processingPoint cloud processingLidar (i.e., topographic, bathymetric, atmospheric)Hyperspectral imaging (HSI)Analytic geometry and advanced statistics"
Satellite/Overhead imagery
Geomatics/Geospatial Intelligence
"Machine learning, pattern recognition, and clustering"
Sensor data fusion
EO/IR imaging systems
Radiometric analysis
Fourier optics
Electro-optical/Image signal processing
Point cloud processing
"Lidar (i.e., topographic, bathymetric, atmospheric)"
Hyperspectral imaging (HSI)
Analytic geometry and advanced statistics
"Experience working with one or more of the following:Laboratory equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzers, and/or data acquisition hardware/softwareComputational tools such as Matlab, Octave, and/or IDLProgramming languages such as Python and/or C++Toolboxes such as CUDA, OpenGL, and Open CVArcGIS"
"Laboratory equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzers, and/or data acquisition hardware/software"
"Computational tools such as Matlab, Octave, and/or IDL"
Programming languages such as Python and/or C++
"Toolboxes such as CUDA, OpenGL, and Open CV"
ArcGIS
"Due to our research contracts with the US federal government, candidates for this position are required to be US Citizens"
Ability to obtain DOD Secret Clearance upon hire
Ability to work in a team environment
"A Master’s degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
"This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required by this position."
"Imaging Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at GAP Solutions in Atlanta, GA"
"Imaging Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Lead machine learning projects, including working with business partners to define the scope and deliverable, developing the analytic plan and time line, leading deployment and delivering results"
"Provide technical advice to other members of the team and across the organization on topics including machine learning code, machine learning algorithms and traversing across multiple big data platforms"
"Identify and lead the evaluation of new software techniques and technologies, including delivery of results"
Identify new applications for machine learning across the company and work with business partners to pilot
"5+ years of reporting experience, analytics experience, or a combination of both; or a BS/BA degree or higher in a quantitative field such as applied math, statistics, engineering, physics, accounting, finance, economics, econometrics, computer sciences, or business/social and behavioral sciences with a quantitative emphasis and 3+ years of reporting experience, analytics experience, or a combination of both"
1 + year of experience using quantitative machine learning techniques
1+ year of Python experience
1+ year of SQL experience
Extensive knowledge and understanding of research and analysis
Strong analytical skills with high attention to detail and accuracy
"Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills"
"Experience with Tensorflow, Theano or Keras"
"Solid understanding of and 1+ year of experience applying machine learning techniques such as neural networks, random forest, GBM and SVM, to form a story"
Experience with signal processing or optimization techniques
"Advanced knowledge of statistical techniques (e.g. sampling, probability, multivariate data analysis, regression, PCA, time-series analysis)"
"Strong ability to retrieve, combine and transform data from numerous information systems"
Strong acumen in diagnosing and resolving data issues
"Experience working with big data infrastructure with tools such as Hive, Spark and h2o"
"Exceptional analytical, critical thinking, quantitative reasoning skills, and problem-solving skills. Ability to relate complex analysis and insights to effective business strategy."
"Other advanced statistical tools such as SAS, R and Weka"
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Wells Fargo in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Exploration and development of machine learning algorithms for spatiotemporal analysis, including multiclass classification, clustering, temporal segmentation, sequence labeling, and spatial segmentation."
Development of new technologies and digital products to improve surgeon and team performance on robotic surgery platforms.
Support academic collaborations in related fields.
"Contributing to multiple areas of research, including but not limited to the following:"
Establishing strong academic collaborations across research disciplines
Presenting research at international conferences and publishing research in top academic journals
"Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or Neuroscience, or Master's degree with minimum (3) years industry experience developing machine learning applications"
Demonstrate excellent communication skills both written and verbal
Interested in early research and development through to product roll-out
"Solid understanding of statistics, machine learning, and deep learning algorithms and techniques is required"
"Experience with sequence modeling, image analysis, and/or temporal segmentation on real-world data is required"
Experience with Python and C/C++ is required
"Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks such as Tensorflow, Theano, Caffe, and/or Torch is required"
"Hands-on experience with CNNs, RNNs, and LSTMs is ideal"
"Experience with R, SQL is ideal"
Experience with clinical studies is a plus
Ability to travel domestically and internationally (5-15%)
"Machine Learning Scientist jobs in Norcross, GA"
"Jobs at Intuitive Surgical in Norcross, GA"
"Machine Learning Scientist salaries in Norcross, GA"
"Work in capacity of a data scientist as part of Data Insights team to design Business Intelligence product.  * Be in a customer facing role and help Varian customers get insights into their data.  * Gather a good understanding of requirement and help other team members to translate it into technology solution.  * Actively contribute to writing ETLs using standard toolkits  * Will need to spend majority of time understanding and curating data  * Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis  * Data mining using state-of-the-art methods  * Create dashboards and customizing dashboards to provide better insights  * Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems  * Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner  * Deliver development supporting artifacts like Use Case diagrams, Class diagrams and Sequence diagrams based on requirement analysis and design  * Provide consulting to development teams when required  * Document the technical implementations and evangelize with development teams  * Participate in cross-functional technical discussions local and remote groups  * Follow process and produce quality deliverables supporting the process  * Participate in software design and review activities  * Develop / innovate solutions to complex problems  * Participate in sprints and component backlogs refinement  * Participate in troubleshooting complex issues in production and resolving defects.  * Production of high quality code.  * Formulates and recommends standards for achieving maximum performance and efficiency of the DW Ecosystem.  * Develop and demonstrate high quality prototypes / modules and finished applications that meet the desired goals, quality and are well documented  * Stay in touch with latest and upcoming BI open source technologies  * Mentoring team members to get up to the speed on technology"
Medical Devices: 5 years
machine learning: 5 years
Data Analysis: 1 year
Healthcare: 5 years
Bachelor's
"Atlanta, GA 30327"
"Quickly understand client needs, develop solutions, and articulate findings to client executives."
Provide data-driven recommendations to clients by clearly articulating complex technical concepts through generation and delivery of presentations.
Analyze and model both structured and unstructured data from a number of distributed client and publicly available sources.
Perform EDA and feature engineering to both inform the development of statistical models and generate improve model performance and flexibility.
Design and build scalable machine learning models to meet the needs of given client engagement.
"Collaborate with client managers to identify business use cases and develop solutions in driving impact through data science and analytics, communicate results, and inform practice group through reports and presentations."
"Develop, enhance, and maintain client relations while ensuring client satisfaction."
"Master’s degree from top tier college/university in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, or other closely related field."
"Strong understanding and application of statistical methods and skills: distributions, experimental design, variance analysis, A/B testing, and regression."
"Statistical emphasis on data mining techniques, Bayesian Networks Inference, CHAID, CART, association rule, linear and non-linear regression, hierarchical mixed models/multi-level modeling, and ability to answer questions about underlying algorithms and processes."
"Mastery of statistical software, scripting languages, and packages (e.g. R, Matlab, SAS, Python, Pearl, Scikit-learn, Caffe, SAP Predictive Analytics, KXEN, ect.)."
"Knowledge of or experience working with database systems (e.g. SQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Postgres, ect.)"
"Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems (e.g. S3, EC2, Hadoop/MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Spark, SAP HANA, ect.)"
"Expertise in machine learning algorithms and experience using the following ML techniques: Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Gradient Boosting, SVMs, Time Series, KMeans, Clustering, NMF)."
"Preferred experience with NLP, Graph Theory, Neural Networks (RNNs/CNNs), sentiment analysis, and Azure ML.."
Experience building scalable data pipelines and with data engineering/ feature engineering.
Preferred experience with web-scrapping.
Experience building and deploying predictive models.
Expertise using PowerPoint and clearly articulating findings/ presenting solutions.
Excellent team-oriented interpersonal skills and demonstrated leadership.
Proven track record delivering successful data science projects and working
"Qualifications: 3-9 years experience, Bachelor’s Degree."
"Should be proficient in Software Engineering Techniques, Software Engineering Architecture, Software Engineering Lifecycle and Data Management."
"Should have progressing skills in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design."
"Data Scientist Manager jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Capgemini in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist Manager salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Creating consumer audience models to drive advertising sales
Developing predictive modeling solutions to target audiences interested in TURNER programming and product adoption
Mining extensive TDC database to craft consumer profiles that inform brand marketing decisions
"Interpreting data, analyze results using statistical techniques"
Building reports and dashboards
Performing ad hoc analyses and data extraction requests
"Currently enrolled in a bachelor program in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Analytics or closely related field."
"Strong communication skills. The ability to successfully communicate analytic results, business insights, and resulting business implications to non-technical business partners"
"Strong programming skills and proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, Scala, SQL, Hive"
"Basic understanding of statistical and data mining concepts and procedures including: regression, machine learning algorithms, and experimental design"
Ability to quickly absorb and synthesize business strategies & processes
An opportunity to work with a great team that is passionate about the same thing you are!
Networking opportunities to meet people that you’d like to know!
A speaker series that introduces you to cool executives and what they do for the best brands!
"Tech Fall Intern jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Turner in Atlanta, GA"
"Tech Fall Intern salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Under minimal supervision, the Assistant Scientist, Bioinformatics performs a wide range of highly technical and complex bioinformatics procedures."
"Qualification for this position requires demonstrated expertise in designing and developing software, databases, and interfaces for analyzing and manipulating research data applications including expertise with simple programming using Perl/Python or Java, statistical programming, web-development, and database query through SQL."
This role collaborates with researchers to develop high throughput data processing and analysis capability.
Directs and guides database searches and the computational analysis of resulting data.
"Provides direct technical support and helps guide, implement, and maintain further improvements to bioinformatics software, databases, and interfaces and works with the entire bioinformatics team to diagnose and fix related issues."
"May assist in grant and other funding applications, as necessary and appropriate."
Demonstrated ability to function as part of a team.
Performs other responsibilities as required.
"PhD in bioinformatics, computer science, biological or physical science and three years of experience."
Experience prior to achieving the PhD will be considered.
"Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Emory University in Atlanta, GA"
"Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Qualifications: 6-12 years experience, Bachelor’s Degree."
"Must have experience in Software Engineering Techniques, Software Engineering Architecture, Software Engineering Lifecycle and Data Management."
"Should be proficient in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design."
"Manager jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Capgemini in Atlanta, GA"
"Manager salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering."
"A Master’s degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering."
0-7 years of professional or graduate experience
Satellite/Overhead imagery
Geomatics/Geospatial Intelligence
"Machine learning, pattern recognition, and clustering"
Sensor data fusion
EO/IR imaging systems
Radiometric analysis
Fourier optics
Electro-optical/Image signal processing
Point cloud processing
"Lidar (i.e., topographic, bathymetric, atmospheric)"
Hyperspectral imaging (HSI)
Analytic geometry and advanced statistics
"Laboratory equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzers, and/or data acquisition hardware/software"
"Computational tools such as Matlab, Octave, and/or IDL"
Programming languages such as Python and/or C++
"Toolboxes such as CUDA, OpenGL, and Open CV"
ArcGIS
"Imaging Scientist Engineer Junior jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Imaging Scientist Engineer Junior salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics."
"A Master’s degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics."
"System Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"System Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Develop and update test plans, procedures and report documentation."
Execute developed test procedures and document results in a formal setting.
Technically coordinate with a cross-functional team to develop test solutions for our DoD sponsor ensuring all products meet allocated requirements and design through formal testing.
"Maintain and create test scripts, files and data that support formal testing."
Work in an integrated product team and understand system and unit level requirements in order to create test plans and procedures.
"Utilize existing system specifications, interface definitions, and aircraft avionics in the development of test procedures."
Ensure that all technical work is performed and documented to appropriate professional standards.
Develop test estimates for proposed work and status current tasking.
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study."
Experience in test engineering processes and methodologies applicable to complex military systems development.
"Manual, ad hoc, black and white box testing."
"Strong collaboration, organization, teaming and communication abilities."
Ability to work well individually or in a group setting.
Ability to work under pressure and time constraints.
Ability to create and deliver technical presentations effectively.
Python or similar scripting language.
"Experience with MIL-STD-1553 data bus, avionics systems, Electronic Warfare systems, tactical data links, military radios, and open systems architectures."
Experience with system security and safety engineering.
Experience with configuration management and requirements management systems.
Experience directing small teams of employees as a task leader
"Test Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Test Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Develop system level requirements from sponsor's high level requirements, decompose and allocate the requirements into a system design describing the architecture structure, and allocate the behavior and data interfaces and map to hardware and software components."
Technically coordinate a cross-functional team to develop technical solutions for our DoD sponsors ensuring all products meet allocated requirements and design.
"Serve as the technical expert on assigned projects and systems including use models, associated products’ capabilities, system interfaces, engineering tools, and the roadmap for current and future updates. The candidate will utilize this expertise to advise the sponsors and promote the sponsor’s position in meetings."
Manage the product backlog and system deficiency reports.
"Utilize existing system specifications, interface definitions, and aircraft drawings in the development of solutions."
Ensure that all technical work is performed and documented to appropriate professional standards.
Design and manage the laboratory configuration for assigned projects.
Integrate system products in laboratory and fielded settings. Analyze flight and laboratory data to determine if system requirements and project objectives are met; and isolate anomalies to hardware and software components.
Develop quantitative feasibility analyses on possible solutions toward increasing system effectiveness and ability to integrate new technologies.
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study."
Experience in system engineering processes and methodologies applicable to complex military systems development.
"Strong collaboration, organization, teaming and communication abilities."
Ability to work well individually or in a group setting.
Ability to work under pressure and time constraints.
Ability to create and deliver technical presentations effectively.
Experience at companies performing in defense or avionics sector
Experience processing and analyzing data with tools such as Python or R.
"Experience with MIL-STD-1553 data bus, avionics systems, Electronic Warfare systems, Tactical Data Links (Link-16, TTNT), military radios, and open systems architectures."
Experience designing systems using SysML.
Experience with system security and safety engineering.
Experience with configuration management and requirements management systems.
Experience directing small teams of employees as a task leader.
"Experience developing avionics systems on military transport (e.g. C-130), fighter planes (F-16, F-22, F-35), and helicopters (H-60)"
"System Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"System Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Define, develop and prototype cognitive solutions such as Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing (NLP), Linguistics, Information Retrieval, Image Recognition, Deep Learning"
Serve as Subject Matter Expert (SME) in the domain of Machine Learning and NLP and help establish a competency in those cognitive areas
"Work closely with functional teams to incorporate cognitive and advanced analytics models and algorithms into product, solutions and offerings"
Possibility to work in client engagements as Machine Learning SME
"Will serve as Thought Leader in Machine Learning and NLP, developing internal and external eminence and intellectual property, as well as support client facing activities and influencing customer facing groups including senior executives, sales, as well as marketing and product development to successfully define, develop and launch new products and solutions"
"Model and algorithm development and optimization, working with software engineers to implement and productize the models and algorithms, engage in project specific activities as part of product development, as well as perform Machine Learning R&D work, develop tools and assets to support advanced Machine Learning development tasks"
Bachelor’s degree.
"Minimum of eight years’ experience of professional post academic work or 5 years’ experience with a Ph.D. or MS in Computer Science, Applied Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline with specialization"
"Experience in Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing, Cognitive Science or other related areas"
"Strong mathematical background with strong knowledge in at least one of the following fields: Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Information Retrieval, Image Recognition"
"Experience with languages such as: Python, R, SQL, and Java"
"Experience with frameworks and libraries such as: Pytorch, Keras, TensorFlow, scikit-learn, xgboost, pandas, Spark, matplotlib, D3, pytest, flask, Docker etc."
Experience with Google and Amazon Machine Learning and Cloud tools
Experience working with both relational and NoSQL databases
Gathering data from both large information systems
Ability to travel 20% of the time
"Preferred Graduate degree (Masters or PhD) in Computer Science, Applied Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline."
Experience leading teams both on and offshore
Experience leading project teams and people as well as executing independently
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to work with diverse teams
"Machine Learning Lead jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Deloitte in Atlanta, GA"
"Machine Learning Lead salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"No commercial experience is necessary, but one or two years’ experience in a technical environment would be an advantage. We are looking for people with the following:"
"Experience with Linux, source control, SQL, and one or more programming languages (Java and python preferred) is a strong advantage but not an absolute prerequisite."
"Good degree from a top tier university in a scientific or numerate discipline, e.g. Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Engineering"
In-depth familiarity with computers and technology
Passion to learn new technical skills.
Ability to handle multiple concurrent projects and prioritize appropriately
Flexibility and adaptability.
"Ability to communicate well with customers, adapting fluidly to different audiences – ranging from highly technical to non-technical business owners."
Must enjoy working in a team of like-minded and intelligent people to solve complex problems.
A focus on personal achievement and responsibilities.
An indication of passion to learn new skills and technologies.
"Attention to grammatical detail, layout and presentation."
Enthusiasm.
"And most importantly, a small company attitude: willingness to adapt to a variable role and a great can-do attitude."
Annual bonus
20 days PTO annually
Healthcare package
Pension plan
Free Friday lunches
Regular social outings
Fridge and cupboards packed full of edible treats
Annual summer social and Christmas dinner
"Implementation Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at eHire in Atlanta, GA"
"Implementation Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in electrical engineer, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines."
"A Master’s degree in electrical engineer, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree n electrical engineer, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines."
0-6 years of relevant work experience
 Knowledge and familiarity with signal processing
 Write software to model various EW systems
" Familiarity with FORTRAN, C, and C++"
" Assist in the design, development, and demonstration of EW simulation experiments"
 Develop and integrate scripts to allow researchers to gather and analyze critical data from the simulation runs
 Familiarity with Linux and open source tools
 Document analysis and maintain configuration management of all software and experiments
" Travel may be involved, as project work may occur in Atlanta or at a location other than Atlanta"
Experience with Python computer language
 Strong math skills and ability to learn complex engineering concepts
 Configuration management tools
 Ability to clearly communicate technical ideas to non-technical audience
 Ability to work independently as well as in a dynamic team environment
"Signal Modeling jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Signal Modeling salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in electrical engineering, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines."
"A Master’s degree in electrical engineering, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in n electrical engineering, computer science, physics, computer engineering, or related disciplines."
Knowledge and familiarity with Modeling and Simulation (M&S)
Write software to model various EW systems
"Familiarity with FORTRAN, C, and C++"
"Assist in the design, development, and demonstration of EW simulation experiments"
Develop and integrate scripts to allow researchers to gather and analyze critical data from the simulation runs
Familiarity with Linux and open source tools
Experience with Python computer language
Strong math skills and ability to learn complex engineering concepts
Configuration management tools
Ability to clearly communicate technical ideas to non-technical audience
Ability to work independently as well as in a dynamic team environment
"Digital Simulation Modeling jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Digital Simulation Modeling salaries in Atlanta, GA"
0-7 years of professional or graduate experience
"Signal Processing Engineer Junior jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Signal Processing Engineer Junior salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Overseeing code releases
Managing IT infrastructure needed to support software code development in dedicated or cloud environments
Selection of deployment models
Direction of testing to validate release and monitor performance after release
"Preparing test data, analyzing results, troubleshooting problems, and communicating issues back to the development team"
"A Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field."
"A Master’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or other technical field and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree, or"
"A Master’s degree and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or other technical field."
Strong scripting skills especially with Bash and Python
"Experience with build tools such as Maven, Gradle, and Make"
Proficient in Linux administration and Configuration Management (Ansible)
"Knowledge of Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery practices, artifact management, and automation pipelines"
Ability to work as part of a team on large and complex development efforts
Strong work ethic and positive attitude
Android development experience
Java development experience
C development experience
"Devop Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Devop Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Bachelors in Computer Science or equivalent field
5 to 8 years of working experience
SQL
"Object Oriented Programming Experience (Java, C#, Objective C, C++)"
Scripting Programming Experience (Python or R)
Linux
Communications & Client Requirements Gathering
Analytics Integration (Operationalizing Machine Learning and/or Statistic Models into Applications)
Basic Statistics (Mean / Std. Dev / Correlation / GLM Regression)
"Basic Machine Learning (Clustering, Decision Trees)"
BI (Tableau or Microstrategy)
"Distributed Machine Learning (H20, SparkML)"
NLP
Scala
Web Development Experience HTML / CSS / JS / SVG
Web Framework Experience (React or Angular)
"Jobs at AT&T in Alpharetta, GA"
"Develop and update test plans, procedures and report documentation."
Execute developed test procedures and document results in a formal setting.
Technically coordinate with a cross-functional team to develop test solutions for our DoD sponsor ensuring all products meet allocated requirements and design through formal testing.
"Maintain and create test scripts, files and data that support formal testing."
Work in an integrated product team and understand system and unit level requirements in order to create test plans and procedures.
"Utilize existing system specifications, interface definitions, and aircraft avionics in the development of test procedures."
Ensure that all technical work is performed and documented to appropriate professional standards.
Develop test estimates for proposed work and status current tasking.
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
Experience in test engineering processes and methodologies applicable to complex military systems development.
"Manual, ad hoc, black and white box testing."
"Strong collaboration, organization, teaming and communication abilities."
Ability to work well individually or in a group setting.
Ability to work under pressure and time constraints.
Ability to create and deliver technical presentations effectively.
Minimum 5 years of applicable experience in a technical field.
Python or similar scripting language.
"Experience with MIL-STD-1553 data bus, avionics systems, Electronic Warfare systems, tactical data links, military radios, and open systems architectures."
Experience with system security and safety engineering.
Experience with configuration management and requirements management systems.
Experience directing small teams of employees as a task leader
"Test Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Test Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or related technical field of study."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or related technical field of study and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or related technical field of study and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or related technical field of study."
0-5 years professional experience in the software engineering domain.
"Knowledge of at least two of the following: Python, Java, C languages, R."
An understanding of cyber security issues and/or intelligence analysis is also required.
Candidate must possess strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required.
Concurrent experience in cybersecurity and/or intelligence analysis domain is a plus.
"Current, industry-recognized certifications (CISSP, GIAC) or the ability to become certified within one year of hire is a plus."
"Experience with Machine Learning tools and techniques like Python, Tensorflow, Carre, etc., is a plus."
Experience with the Hadoop or Apache Spark ecosystem is a plus.
Active Top Secret clearance is a plus.
"Software Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Software Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Manager jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Newell Brands in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Manager salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Delivering production level code at a regular cadence using Agile techniques, tools and methodologies"
"Building automation tools and components to aid in installation and provisioning of cloud-based applications in AWS, Azure, or similar cloud providers"
"Collaborating with Software Architects, Software Engineers, and Data Scientists and ensuring products and services are pushed into production."
Automating the deployment of products and services and actively monitoring to ensure uptime and effective performance of applications and platforms.
"Previous experience utilizing Terraform, CloudFormation or similar tools."
"Previous experience with Ansible, Chef or similar tools."
"Experience using or working in a cloud environment such as AWS, Google Cloud Platform or other common public cloud providers."
Experience with Python.
"Strong attention to detail, passion for learning new technologies and techniques and a drive for continually improving the platform."
"BS in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, or equivalent experience"
"Networking experience (TCP/IP stack, routing, switching, LAN segmentation, etc)"
Experience working with Kubernetes and containerized workloads.
Experience with Packer
Experience with or the willingness to learn Go.
Prior experience working at a startup or in an entrepreneurial environment
"Jobs at DELL in Atlanta, GA"
"Develop system level requirements from sponsor's high level requirements, decompose and allocate the requirements into a system design describing the architecture structure, and allocate the behavior and data interfaces and map to hardware and software components."
Technically coordinate a cross-functional team to develop technical solutions for our DoD sponsors ensuring all products meet allocated requirements and design.
"Serve as the technical expert on assigned projects and systems including use models, associated products’ capabilities, system interfaces, engineering tools, and the roadmap for current and future updates. The candidate will utilize this expertise to advise the sponsors and promote the sponsor’s position in meetings."
Manage the product backlog and system deficiency reports.
"Utilize existing system specifications, interface definitions, and aircraft drawings in the development of solutions."
Ensure that all technical work is performed and documented to appropriate professional standards.
Design and manage the laboratory configuration for assigned projects.
Integrate system products in laboratory and fielded settings. Analyze flight and laboratory data to determine if system requirements and project objectives are met; and isolate anomalies to hardware and software components.
Develop quantitative feasibility analyses on possible solutions toward increasing system effectiveness and ability to integrate new technologies.
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
Experience in system engineering processes and methodologies applicable to complex military systems development.
"Strong collaboration, organization, teaming and communication abilities."
Ability to work well individually or in a group setting.
Ability to work under pressure and time constraints.
Ability to create and deliver technical presentations effectively.
Experience at companies performing in defense or avionics sector.
Minimum 5 years of applicable experience in a technical field.
Experience processing and analyzing data with tools such as Python or R.
"Experience with MIL-STD-1553 data bus, avionics systems, Electronic Warfare systems, Tactical Data Links (Link-16, TTNT), military radios, and open systems architectures."
Experience designing systems using SysML.
Experience with system security and safety engineering.
Experience with configuration management and requirements management systems.
Experience directing small teams of employees as a task leader.
"Experience developing avionics systems on military transport (e.g. C-130), fighter planes (F-16, F-22, F-35), and helicopters (H-60)"
"System Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"System Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Bachelor’s degree Computer Science, Design, Information Systems, Electrical Engineering or related discipline; Master's degree is a plus"
"Expert in Python, Ruby, JavaScript, or similar scripting"
"Expert understanding of full-stack web development and common frameworks (e.g. Python, Ruby or JavaScript runtime platforms like Node.js)"
Experience working with relational or non-relational databases
"Experience with cloud services such as those offered through AWS (e.g. EC2, S3, Redshift, RDS, Lambda, SNS, etc.)"
Experience architecting systems and selecting technologies to underpin web services
"Proven record of shipping cutting-edge, intuitive, responsive web applications"
Active GitHub and/or personal web portfolio
"Experience with Pandas, NumPy, SciPy, NLTK, TensorFlow is a plus"
"Full Stack Developer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at McKinsey & Company in Atlanta, GA"
"Full Stack Developer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Xylem in Atlanta, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
"Candidates should have prior experience leading large project efforts and/or leading engineering teams. Prior branch-level leadership experience is not required, but will be taken into consideration."
"Prior experience working with at least one major FPGA vendor design tool suite (Xlinx ISE and/or Vivado, Altera Quartus Tool Suites, Microsemi Libero) and a demonstrated understanding of standard FPGA design flow (Synthesis, Place and Route, Simulation, Timing Analysis, Floor Planning)"
"Experience designing hardware leveraging at least one industry standard HDL language (e.g. Verilog, System Verilog, VHDL)"
"Design experience with high-speed hardware interfaces, data flow (FIFOs, clock domain crossing), and bus protocols (e.g. AXI, AMBA)"
"Experience designing FPGA applications for one or more of the following domains: High-speed networking, wireless communications, radar applications, image processing, machine learning"
Experience with Octave/Python/MATLAB/Simulink for modeling digital signal processing blocks.
"Experience with analog/digital circuit design, and PCB design and manufacturing"
"Experience with low-level (C/C++) programming and a high-level scripting language (e.g. Python, TCL)"
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and eleven (11) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience."
"At least 7 years experience in software development, programming with one or more software languages including C/C++, Java, Python, Matlab etc."
Demonstrated experience with algorithm and data structure design
Demonstrated experience with software testing methods
"Familiarity with revision control concepts and tools (e.g., Git)"
Comfortable developing and working in a Linux environment
"Experience working with at least one major FPGA vendor design tool suite (Xlinx ISE and/or Vivado, Altera Quartus Tool Suites, Microsemi Libero) and a demonstrated understanding of standard FPGA design flow (Synthesis, Place and Route, Simulation, Timing Analysis, Floor Planning)"
"Experience with one of the following frameworks: RapidWright, TORC, RapidSmith, VPR, or VTR"
Experience designing or extending EDA/CAD tools in any capacity.
Experience leveraging formal methods for verification and validation of HW and SW designs with SVA and industry leading formal tools.
"Modeling and Simulation, leveraging statistical analysis techniques"
Knowledge of graph theory/analytics/visualization or combinatorial mathematics
"Strong knowledge of Boolean math, fixed-point math, floating point math"
"Development, implementation, and documentation of verification & validation plans, test procedures and test automation processes"
Experience with cross-compiling for various targets
"Senior Software Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Software Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Capture system level requirements by brainstorming with Sr. Architects, Data Scientists, Businesses & Product Managers"
"Identify the scope of the work, provide initial estimate and justify the estimate with facts"
Demonstrate the understanding of Agile software development lifecycle and able to distinguish the core inputs and outputs in each cycle.
Engage in technical discussions; participate in technical designs and present technical ideas through white boarding
Work closely with your peers and keep engaging in a fast pace technical design and development team
Execute in a fast pace delivery mode and focus in delivering tasks to meet the product release goal
"Maintain code quality through best practices, unit testing and code quality automation"
Seek and provide feedback on design and development
Demonstrate the ability to make informed technology choices after due diligence and impact assessment
"Understand whole product, its modules and the interrelationship between them while being an expert in the assigned component or module"
Help in designing interfaces and information exchange between modules
"Possess advanced domain knowledge and show great customer focus. Expert in processes / methodologies and Skilled in build, release & deployment processes"
Articulate the need for scalability and understand the importance of improving quality through testing.
Be an expert in writing code that meets standards and delivers the desired functionality using the technology selected for the project
"Drive design reviews, define interfaces between code modules, and applies existing technology to designs"
Be an expert in assessing application performance and optimizing/improving it through design and best coding practices
Be an expert in core data structures as well as algorithms and has the ability to implement them using language of choice
"Be responsible for providing technical leadership and defining, developing, and evolving software in a fast paced and agile development environment using the latest software development technologies and infrastructure"
Provide guidance to a team of 5 to 7 developers with either planning and execution and/or design architecture using agile methodologies such as SCRUM
Work with Product Line Leaders (PLLs) to understand product requirements & visionQualifications/Requirements:Basic Qualifications:
"Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or in “STEM” Majors (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math)"
"A minimum of 7 years of professional experience in Software Development, DevOps, IT, and/or Cloud TechnologiesEligibility Requirements:"
"Legal authorization to work in the U.S. is required. We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job"
Must be willing to travel 5-10% of the time
"Must be willing to work out of an office located in Atlanta, GADesired Characteristics:Technical Expertise:"
Experience mentoring other engineers and collaborating in a large scale environment
"Strong communication skills, initiative, and desire to help customers transform and achieve success"
"Willing to learn and utilize new technologies, concepts and procedures as appropriate to project requirements"
"Fluent in AWS services, 1 or more certification a big plus (Solutions Architect, Develop, etc.)"
Familiarity with source control systems (Git)
"Strong knowledge of web services (REST, etc.), using languages such as Python, NodeJS, and Go"
"Good working knowledge of SQL Database design such as MySQL, PostgreSQL etc."
"Strong knowledge of web development using HTML5, JavaScript, CSS"
Experience with modern web technologies such as Vue is a big plus
"Strong knowledge of Object Oriented Analysis and Design, and Software Design Patterns"
Experience with NoSQL Database is a big plus
Familiar with the challenges surrounding developing and running production servicesBusiness Acumen:
Strong problem solving abilities and capable of articulating specific technical topics or assignments
Experience in building scalable and highly available distributed systems
Expert in breaking down problems and estimate time for development tasks
Evangelizes how our technology solves customer problems from a technology and business perspectiveLeadership:
Demonstrates clarity of thinking to work through limited information and vague problem definitions
"Influences through others; builds direct and ""behind the scenes"" support for ideas"
Proactively identifies and removes project obstacles or barriers on behalf of the team
"Shares knowledge, power, and credit, establishing trust, credibility, and goodwillPersonal Attributes:"
Able to work under minimal supervision
Excellent communication skills and the ability to interface with senior leadership with confidence and clarity
"Able to work well with global teams, including time-zone flexibility"
Skilled in providing oversight and mentoring team members. Shows ability to effectively delegate work#DTRLocations: United States; Georgia; AtlantaGE will only employ those who are legally authorized to work in the United States for this opening.
"Staff Software Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at General Electric in Atlanta, GA"
"Staff Software Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Business Intelligence Analyst jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at The Home Depot in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Business Intelligence Analyst salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Develop and support tools to record video and robotic system data
Develop customized tools to spatially and temporally annotate data based on video review
Support integration of databases with advanced analytics and machine learning environments
"Test and maintain large databases of videos, system data, and meta data"
"Work closely with research data scientists throughout analysis, visualization, and modeling efforts"
"Support multiple engineering and analytics teams in collecting, accessing, and analyzing data"
"Keep current with our software/hardware deployment and cybersecurity strategies and understand overall trends in AI, ML and Cloud technologies"
Work with product development teams to bring data products to market
"Continuously explore optimal data recording solutions, database designs, storage solutions, and analysis environments"
"M.S. in Computer Science, Software/Computer Engineering, or Applied Math, or B.S. degree with minimum (3) years industry experience developing software"
Interested in early research and development/prototype efforts
Demonstrate excellent communication skills both written and verbal
"Hands-on experience with Python, C++, and Matlab is required"
Proficient in Postgres and/or SQL-based technologies is required
Experience with database design and management is required
Experience with R and R Shiny is ideal
"Experience with AWS/cloud storage, hosting, and compute environments is ideal"
Experience with Python web frameworks such as Django or Flask or other open source frameworks is ideal
"Experience with video recording, compression, and streaming is ideal"
Ability to travel domestically and internationally (10-20%)
"Software Engineer jobs in Norcross, GA"
"Jobs at Intuitive Surgical in Norcross, GA"
"Software Engineer salaries in Norcross, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and eleven (11) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience."
"Candidate should have a strong understanding of embedded systems, hardware design, digital logic design, and various hardware architectures."
"Experience working with at least one major FPGA vendor design tool suite (Xlinx ISE and/or Vivado, Altera Quartus Tool Suites, Microsemi Libero) and a demonstrated understanding of standard FPGA design flow (Synthesis, Place and Route, Simulation, Timing Analysis, Floor Planning)"
"Experience designing hardware leveraging at least one industry standard HDL language (e.g. Verilog, System Verilog, VHDL)"
"Hands on experience with hardware testing, troubleshooting, and embedded hardware/software integration."
"Proficiency with using general laboratory test equipment such as oscilloscopes, logic analyzers."
"Experience with development, implementation, and documentation of verification and validation of hardware designs leveraging industry standard tools and methods (e.g. ModelSim, System Verilog, UVM, BFM’s)"
"Design experience with high-speed hardware interfaces, data flow (FIFOs, clock domain crossing), and bus protocols (e.g. AXI, AMBA)"
"Experience designing FPGA applications for one or more of the following domains: High-speed networking, wireless communications, radar applications, image processing, machine learning"
Experience with Octave/Python/MATLAB/Simulink for modeling digital signal processing blocks.
"Experience with analog/digital circuit design, and PCB design and manufacturing"
"Experience with low-level (C/C++) programming and a high-level scripting language (e.g. Python, TCL)"
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
"Senior Fpga Hardware Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Fpga Hardware Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in in physics, electrical and computer engineering, computer science, or a related discipline."
"A Master’s degree in in physics, electrical and computer engineering, computer science, or a related discipline and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in in physics, electrical and computer engineering, computer science, or a related discipline."
0-6 years of relevant work experience
Knowledge and familiarity with infrared (IR) physics concepts
Write software to model various EW systems
"Familiarity with FORTRAN, C, and C++"
"Assist in the design, development, and demonstration of EW simulation experiments"
Develop and integrate scripts to allow researchers to gather and analyze critical data from the simulation runs
Familiarity with Linux and open source tools
Document analysis and maintain configuration management of all software and experiments
"Travel may be involved, as project work may occur in Atlanta or at a location other than Atlanta"
Experience with Python computer language
Strong math skills and ability to learn complex engineering concepts
Configuration management tools
Ability to clearly communicate technical ideas to non-technical audience
Ability to work independently as well as in a dynamic team environment
"Missile Warning System jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Missile Warning System salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Electrical and Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Physics."
"A Master’s degree in Electrical and Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Physics and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Electrical and Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Physics."
0-7 years of professional or graduate experience
"Electrical Computer Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Electrical Computer Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics and four (4) years of relevant full-time experience."
"A Master’s degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics and eleven (11) years' relevant full-time experience; or"
"A Doctoral degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematicsand seven (7) years' relevant full-time experience."
"System Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"System Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Signal Processing Engineer Senior jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Signal Processing Engineer Senior salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Post Doctoral Fellow jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Emory University in Atlanta, GA"
"Post Doctoral Fellow salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Broad Knowledge of data science & machine learning (clustering, decision tree learning, predictive modeling, neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks."
"Practical experience with specific data science techniques: Longitudinal datasets and Classification (e.g., Random Forest)."
Experience building predictive models using R.
"Experience with R packages for classification (e.g., rpart, tree)."
Strong RDBMS data modeling and SQL experience.
Performance tuning experience
"Advanced degree in Mathematics, Statistics or Analytics. Graduates from top-end programs will be given priority."
Conversational English skills (verbal & written).
Analytical experience in the healthcare industry.
Big 5 consulting experience in machine learning or analytics.
"Experience with the full development lifecycle from ingestion & preparation of large volumes of data to the creation, implementation & refinement of predictive models."
"Experience with data wrangling tools – e.g., Tidyverse."
Experience with Python
"Data Scientist jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Matrix Resources in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Scientist salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Matching and refreshing hundreds of millions of candidate profiles.
"Productionizing data science applications, such as recommendation engines, that power multiple CareerBuilder sites."
"Writing and maintaining Spark applications that enhance, normalize, and match hundreds of millions of profiles in scalable manner."
Keeping the data science workflows that power CareerBuilder sites up and running.
Working with data scientists to deploy newly created data science workflows to production.
Strong Java skill
String understanding of object-oriented programming and good coding practices
"Experience with a version control system, preferably Git"
Decent knowledge in Linux operating system
Shell scripting
"Familiarity with a SQL languages, such as MS SQL, MySQL, etc."
Basic understanding of agile methodologies
"Experience with Spark or other BigData technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, HBase, MapReduce, Scalding, etc."
Experience with Scala and/or other functional programming languages
Experience with Python
Knowledge in machine learning
Training that positions you to hit the ground running with ongoing learning and development courses; we never stop investing in our people.
"Comprehensive Medical, Dental & Vision Programs"
"Education Reimbursement Program allowing up to $5k per year towards completion of a Bachelor’s and non-MBA graduate degree, and up to $10K per year towards completion of an MBA! No strings attached!"
"$400 Annual Reimbursement for Wellness Activities, including your gym membership!"
401(k) Program with Strong Employer Match and 2 year vesting schedule!
"Software Engineer jobs in Norcross, GA"
"Jobs at CareerBuilder Careers in Norcross, GA"
"Software Engineer salaries in Norcross, GA"
"Provide technical thought leadership on High Level Architecture and Design, data modeling, Big Data strategy & adoption for Ingestion and Analytics Applications within the Finance IT domain"
Deliver business solutions across multiple business processes by leveraging the Finance IT Data and Analytic platforms and services
Participates in setting strategy and standards through data architecture and implementation leveraging big data and analytics tools and technologies
Designs high level solutions and leverages techniques across diverse data sources
"Build, coach, mentor, and lead a world class data and analytics engineering team"
Drive the overall mapping of Business ERPs with the centralized standard data model and ensure extensibility of overall data architecture
Drive standards across teams to eliminate duplication and rework and promote the Data strategy
"Leads the research and evaluation of emerging data technology, industry and market trends to assist in project development and/or operational support activities (S4 Hana, RPA, …)"
"Analyze, design and develop a roadmap and implementation plan based upon a current vs. future state in a cohesive architecture environment"
"Provides leadership, technology guidance and mentors others throughout the data domain"
"Drive innovative and creative solutions to decommission traditional warehouses and drive cutting-edge analytics from the Data Lake"",""qualification"":"""
"Driving operational excellence by using data and analytics to drive visibility, insights and actions to facilitate decision making in the Finance function"
"Lead program management, including operationalization of analytic methods and products in functional settings, and drive agile development of new methods and capabilities"
"Ensure customer adoption & drive consumption of analytics, and maximize usage and use of analytics with customers"
"Maintain effective working relationship with business leaders, stakeholders, users and partners to integrate programs into overall strategic objectives"
"Conduct project reviews, feasibility, prioritization, initiation, execution, user acceptance, operationalization for all project work related to the data science program(s)"
"Effectively communicate (i.e. status, issues, and escalations) to leadership and other various levels of the organizationQualifications/Requirements:Basic Qualifications:"
"Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Applied Statistics OR in ""STEM"" Majors(Science, Technology, Engineering and Math)"
"Minimum of 3 years of experience working with Data Management, Business Intelligence, or Data Analytics"
8+ year experience as a techno-functional senior ERP professional with a background in Finance; Oracle and SAP preferred
"GB/BB certified – Able to use tools (analytics, CAP, Six Sigma) and techniques to drive change"
Strong program / project management skillEligibility Requirements:
"Legal authorization to work in the U.S. is required. We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job"
Must be willing to travel 10% of the time
"Must be willing to work out of an office located in Atlanta, GA or Baden, SwitzerlandDesired Characteristics:"
Experience in enterprise environment with data management and / or analytics responsibilities
Proven hands-on experience with Functional /Conceptual modeling; Data and Process modeling in an Oracle/SAP
"Strong understanding of Big Data, Data Warehousing, Analytics, Business Intelligence, Data Integration (ETL, EAI), and Data Replication"
"Proven analytical and problem resolution skills, excellent communication skills"
Previous experience with Oracle/SAP ERP implementations
Demonstrated oral and written communication skills and ability to work cross functionally
Passionate about driving change and influence across enterprise
Demonstrated ability to lead in a highly matrixed environment
Ability to work with cross-functional teams to drive operationalization of analytic products and help teams to transform processes through analytics
"Strong ability to communicate deep analytical results in forms that resonate with the business collaborators, highlighting actionable insights"
Entrepreneurial inclination to discover novel opportunities for applying analytical techniques to business/scientific problems across the company
Ability to acquire any specialized domain knowledge required to be more effective in all required activities
"Working knowledge of mathematics, statistics, text mining, and modeling skills"
"Willingness to learn and develop critical data science skills (e.g. statistical analyses, advanced data visualization, data mining, and data cleansing/transformation)"
"Working knowledge of Big Data programming environments and Competency in major analytics software packages and programming environments (e.g. Hadoop / Map-Reduce, Mahout; Python, R, Java etc. in Big data paradigms)"
"Hands on experience working with database technologies, including Oracle, SAP, SQL / NoSQL platforms, visualization applications such as Spotfire or Tableau"
Familiarity with writing SQL queries and working with databases
Green Belt / Black Belt certificationTechnical Expertise:
Understands technical and business discussions relative to future architecture direction aligning with business goals.
Understands concepts of setting and driving architecture direction.
Familiar with elements of gathering architecture requirements.
Understands architecture standards concepts to apply to project work.Business Acumen:
Demonstrates the initiative to explore alternate technology and approaches to solving problems
"Skilled in breaking down problems, documenting problem statements and estimating efforts"
Has the ability to analyze impact of technology choices
Skilled in balancing value propositions for competing stakeholders.Leadership:
Coaches and mentors team members.
Familiar with concepts of costing hardware and software components. Works to assure work is on-time and within budget.
"Delivers tasks on-time with alignment to architectural goals. Can identify and raise issues, risks and benefits."
Participates in change initiatives by implementing new directions and providing appropriate information and feedback.Personal Attributes:
"Applies values, policies, procedures and precedent to make timely, routine decisions of limited, clear choice."
Reacts open-mindedly to new perspectives or ideas. Considers different or unusual solutions when appropriate.
Resolves day-to-day issues related to strategy implementation. Escalates issues that impact the client and/or strategic initiatives.#DTRLocations: United States; Georgia; AtlantaGE will only employ those who are legally authorized to work in the United States for this opening.
"Senior Director jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at General Electric in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Director salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Developing partnership relationships with the client's executive level personnel and manage multiple and/or complex consulting projects at one or more clients through hands on delivery
"Retrieve, prepare, and process a rich data variety of data sources such as social media, news, internal/external documents, emails, financial data, and operational data"
"Analyze and model structured data and implement algorithms to support analysis using advanced statistical and mathematical methods from statistics, machine learning, data mining, econometrics, and operations research"
"Perform Statistical Natural Language Processing to mine unstructured data, using methods such as document clustering, topic analysis, named entity recognition, document classification, and sentiment analysis"
"Translate advanced business analytics problems into technical approaches that yield actionable recommendations, in diverse domains such as risk management, product development, marketing research, supply chain, and public policy; communicate results and educate others through insightful visualizations, reports and presentations"
"Perform exploratory data analysis, generate and test working hypotheses, and uncover interesting trends and relationships"
"A minimum of ten years of relevant experience and strong knowledge in at least one of the following fields: statistics, data mining, machine learning, statistics, operations research, econometrics, natural language processing, and/or information retrieval and a minimum of ten years of management consulting, advisory, professional services and/or Big 4 consulting experience"
"Master's degree or PhD from an accredited college/university in one or more of the following: Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Bioinformatics, Econometrics, Physics, Operations Research, or related fields"
Proposal development experience including the ability to effectively sell business solutions to Insurance clients; $3M+ in delivered revenue
"Deep experience in extracting, cleaning, preparing, and modeling data; command-line scripting, data structures, and algorithms; and working in a Linux environment and proficiency in analysis packages (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab) and programming languages (e.g. Python, Ruby, Java, Scala)"
"Ability to translate engagement objectives to a project plan with milestones, and resource/technology requirements, and teach, lead, and manage projects to successful execution; Ability to work across multiple engagements with clients to assess needs, provide assistance, and resolve problems, using excellent problem-solving skills and verbal/written communication to non-technical audiences; Experience developing partnership relationships with the client's executive level personnel"
Ability to travel up to eighty percent of the time. Must be legally authorized to work in the US without sponsorship of a VISA.
"Director jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at KPMG in Atlanta, GA"
"Director salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Experience with traditional SQL or distributed databases such as Oracle/MS SQL or Vertica.
"Experience with UNIX/LINUX software development in languages such as Perl, Python, Java and SQL."
"Experience using Source Code and Version Control systems like SVN, Git, etc"
Strong desire to learn and adopt new technologies.
"Ability to work well in a cooperative, time-sensitive, market-driven environment"
Ability to manage multiple priorities with minimal supervision
Ability to work individually and with the group on complex problem solving
"Analytical skills, critical thinking and a strong desire to learn"
"Understanding of Business Intelligence solutions, preferably with hands-on experience in Tableau or similar tools"
"Understanding of economics and financial markets, especially with Mortgages"
"Jobs at Bank of America in Atlanta, GA"
"Use cases: image recognition, image processing, NLP, OCR, forecasting, clustering, etc."
Stacking models
"Advanced Analytic Consultant jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Slalom Consulting in Atlanta, GA"
"Advanced Analytic Consultant salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Imaging Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Geomatics, Civil Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
7 years of professional or graduate experience
Satellite/Overhead imagery
Geomatics/Geospatial Intelligence
"Machine learning, pattern recognition, and clustering"
Sensor data fusion
EO/IR imaging systems
Radiometric analysis
Fourier optics
Electro-optical/Image signal processing
Point cloud processing
"Lidar (i.e., topographic, bathymetric, atmospheric)"
Hyperspectral imaging (HSI)
Analytic geometry and advanced statistics
"Laboratory equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzers, and/or data acquisition hardware/software"
"Computational tools such as Matlab, Octave, and/or IDL"
Programming languages such as Python and/or C++
"Toolboxes such as CUDA, OpenGL, and Open CV"
ArcGIS
"Imaging Scientist Engineer Senior jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Imaging Scientist Engineer Senior salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Design, build, and maintain scalable and resilient API services that expose our data to internal teams and developers"
Evolve our data engineering and ETL architecture
Facilitate cross-functional data-integration efforts upstream and downstream
"Detect data quality issues, identify their root causes, implement fixes, and design data audits to capture the issues in the future"
5+ years of professional software engineering experience
"Extensive experience with data processing and manipulation in Java and Python with Hadoop, Pig, Spark, and Hive"
"Interest in learning or direct experience with open-source data processing and warehousing technologies (HBase, Druid, ElasticSearch, MemSQL, Impala, etc.)"
"Experience as a full-stack engineer with a desire to focus on APIs, tools, and the services backing them up"
"Bonus: Familiarity with open-source event stream processing technologies (Samza, Flink, Kafka, Spark Streaming, Storm, etc.)"
"Able to communicate clearly and effectively, especially to a less technical audience"
Hungry to learn new systems and technologies
Self-directed and able to take ownership of your work from design & implementation through deployment & monitoring
Bias for continuous improvement and a demonstrated ability to effect change through leadership and mentoring
"Senior Data Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Pandora Media in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Data Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Develop data for use in analytical projects including model development. Collaborate extensively with Analytics teams to ingest data from internal and external sources, cleanse data, merge and summarize to meet project needs. This includes integration of Equifax data assets, customer and third party data"
"Develop data schemas and derived attributes to be used for research, development and deployment to production and fulfillment platforms."
"Design and build the infrastructure for data extraction, preparation, and loading of data from a variety of sources and technologies."
Always angle for greater efficiency across all of our company data systems.
Port existing and legacy data preparation programs to big data technologies.
"Ensure quality, coverage and accuracy of prepared data. Validate data quality content in conjunction with data stewards."
Stay current with the rapidly developing Big Data technologies landscape. Prototype and integrate tools into Big Data environment and lead adoption of tools through Data and Analytics.
Ensure proper use of Equifax data assets through use of Equifax Security and Data Governance policies.
"5+ years' experience in Big Data technology including: HIVE, Impala, Python, and Scala"
"Real project experience as a Data Wrangler/Engineer across design, development, testing, and production implementation for a Big Data Project"
Strong data analysis skills including skills to rapidly learn new data assets
Experience with legacy and modern data formats and ability to transform to Hadoop AVRO and Parquet formats.
Ability and desire to communicate technical matters in order to train others and lead adoption of new tools and technologies.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to project manage and work with cross-functional teams
Ability to overcome obstacles to solve the hardest problems
Flexible and responsive with ability to adapt to rapid change in direction or business priority
Limited domestic and international travel is possible.
Ability to work independently with limited supervision as well as contribute to team efforts is required
"Experience working with Spark, Map Reduce, and Kafka"
 Knowledge of Equifax's differentiated data assets and technology delivery platforms or equivalent industry experience
Bachelor's Degree (Computer Science/Engineering or equivalent work experience)
Master's degree (preferred)
"Big Data Engineer jobs in Alpharetta, GA"
"Jobs at Equifax in Alpharetta, GA"
"Big Data Engineer salaries in Alpharetta, GA"
"Work in collaborative environment with global teams to drive client engagements in a broad range of industries: Aerospace & Defense, Automotive, Banking, Consumer Products & Retail, Financial Services, Healthcare, High Tech, Industrial Products, Insurance, Life Sciences, Manufacturing, Public Sector, Telecom, Media & Entertainment, and Energy & Utilities."
"Quickly understand client needs, develop solutions, and articulate findings to client executives."
Provide data-driven recommendations to clients by clearly articulating complex technical concepts through generation and delivery of presentations.
Analyze and model both structured and unstructured data from a number of distributed client and publicly available sources.
Perform EDA and feature engineering to both inform the development of statistical models and generate improve model performance and flexibility.
Design and build scalable machine learning models to meet the needs of given client engagement.
Assist with the mentorship and development of consultants.
"Assist in growing data science practice by meeting business goals through client prospecting, responding to proposals, identifying and closing opportunities within identified client accounts."
3-5 years professional work experience as a data scientist or on advanced analytics / statistics projects.
"Master’s degree from top tier college/university in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, or other closely related field."
PhD preferred.
"Strong understanding and application of statistical methods and skills: distributions, experimental design, variance analysis, A/B testing, and regression."
"Statistical emphasis on data mining techniques, Bayesian Networks Inference, CHAID, CART, association rule, linear and non-linear regression, hierarchical mixed models/multi-level modeling, and ability to answer questions about underlying algorithms and processes."
Experience with both Bayesian and frequentist methodologies.
"Mastery of statistical software, scripting languages, and packages (e.g. R, Matlab, SAS, Python, Pearl, Scikit-learn, Caffe, SAP Predictive Analytics, KXEN, ect.)."
"Knowledge of or experience working with database systems (e.g. SQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Postgres, ect.)"
"Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems (e.g. S3, EC2, Hadoop/MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Spark, SAP HANA ect.)"
"Expertise in machine learning algorithms and experience using the following ML techniques: Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Gradient Boosting, SVMs, Time Series, KMeans, Clustering, NMF)."
"Preferred experience with NLP, Graph Theory, Neural Networks (RNNs/CNNs), sentiment analysis and Azure ML."
Experience building scalable data pipelines and with data engineering/ feature engineering.
Preferred experience with web-scrapping.
Experience building and deploying predictive models.
Experience with PowerPoint and ability to clearly articulate findings and present solutions.
Excellent team-oriented and interpersonal skills.
"Qualification: Minimum 3 years experience, Bachelor’s Degree."
Certification: Should have or seeking SE Level 1.
Should be proficient in Package Configuration.
"Should have progressing skills in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Testing, Architecture Knowledge, Technical Solution Design and Vendor Management"
"Data Science jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Capgemini in Atlanta, GA"
"Data Science salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at The Home Depot in Atlanta, GA"
Hadoop: 5 years
Information Technology: 9 years
Big Data Engineer: 5 years
"HDFS, Map Reduce and Hadoop Ecosystem: 5 years"
Java: 3 years
"A Master’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Optical Engineering, Optical Sciences and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Optical Engineering, Optical Sciencesand four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
0-7 years of professional or graduate experience
Optical design and analysis in Zemax
Optical subsystem assembly and alignment
"Detector technologies (i.e., FPAs, APDs, PMTs)"
EO/IR imaging systems
Radiometric analysis
Fourier optics
Electro-optical signal processing
"Lidar (i.e., topographic, bathymetric, atmospheric)"
"Coherent optical techniques (i.e., interferometry, vibrometry, holography, OCT)"
Hyperspectral imaging (HSI)
Familiarity with GD&T and manufacturing of both optics and machined components.
Solidworks
"Laboratory equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzers, and/or data acquisition hardware/software"
"Computational tools such as Matlab, Octave, and/or IDL"
Programming languages such as Python and/or C++
"Optical Scientist Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Optical Scientist Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering."
"Experience in software development, programming with one or more software languages including C/C++, Java, Python, Matlab etc."
Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of various algorithms and data structure design
Demonstrated knowledge of software testing methods
"Familiarity with revision control concepts and tools (e.g., Git)"
Comfortable developing and working in a Linux environment
"Experience working with at least one major FPGA vendor design tool suite (Xlinx ISE and/or Vivado, Altera Quartus Tool Suites, Microsemi Libero) and a demonstrated understanding of standard FPGA design flow (Synthesis, Place and Route, Simulation, Timing Analysis, Floor Planning)"
"Experience with one of the following frameworks: RapidWright, TORC, RapidSmith, VPR or VTR"
Experience designing or extending EDA/CAD tools in any capacity
Experience leveraging Formal methods for verification and validation of HW and SW designs with SVA and industry leading formal tools
"Modeling and Simulation, leveraging statistical analysis techniques"
Knowledge of graph theory/analytics/visualization or combinatorial mathematics
"Strong knowledge of Boolean math, fixed-point math, floating point math"
Experience with cross-compiling for various targets
"Software Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Software Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Political Science, etc. Graduate degree referred"
"4+ years of experience in analytics and data science with a minimum of 2+ years conducting analysis in R, Python, SAS, etc."
"Deep knowledge of a variety of statistical data mining methods including: linear and logistic regression, machine learning algorithms, experimental design and statistical graphics"
Experience with relational databases and SQL preferred as well as knowledge of cloud-based environments like AWS
Ability to distill large bodies of research to key findings and explain them to non-technical audience
"Basic web programming skills, including experience with API integrations for data retrieval"
Interest in and knowledge of news and the news landscape
Experience with digital and television measurement a plus
Lead the development of big data analytics and cloud applications to facilitate the work of data scientists and solution developers
Work with KPMG industry experts to understand the needs and analytics use cases
"Architect, develop, build, test, and deploy applications using iterative, and agile-like development processes"
"Translate advanced business analytics problems into technical approaches that yield actionable recommendations, in diverse domains such as risk management, product development, marketing research, supply chain and public policy"
Architect and develop applications for cloud environments utilizing cloud computing services
"Communicate results and educate others through insightful visualizations, presentations and demonstrations"
"A minimum of four years of Software Engineer experience; two years of experience with distributed computing and big data systems (such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Pig, Storm, Kafka), Relational Databases (RDBMS), SQL and NOSQL data stores"
"Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Engineering, or related fields from an accredited college/university; Master’s degree from an accredited college/university preferred"
"Fluency in several programming languages such as Python, Java, or JavaScript, with the ability to pick up new languages and technologies quickly"
"Experience working within a Cloud Environment, Azure preferred"
"Proficiency with Git, Jira, Confluence and with Linux/Unix environments; proficiency with Agile software development"
"Strong written and verbal communication skills, ability to work in dynamic team environments and multi-task effectively"
"Big Data Software Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at KPMG in Atlanta, GA"
"Big Data Software Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
Assist the development of big data analytics and cloud applications to facilitate the work of data scientists and solution developers
Work with KPMG industry experts to understand the needs and analytics use cases
"Support the Architecture, development, building, testing, and deployment of applications using iterative and agile-like development processes"
"Translate advanced business analytics problems into technical approaches that yield actionable recommendations, in diverse domains such as risk management, product development, marketing research, supply chain and public policy"
Architect and develop applications for cloud environments utilizing cloud computing services
"Communicate results and educate others through insightful visualizations, presentations, and demonstrations"
"Minimum of two years of Software Engineer experience; one year of experience with distributed computing and big data systems (such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Pig, Storm, Kafka), Relational Databases (RDBMS), SQL and NOSQL data stores"
"Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Engineering, or related fields from an accredited college/university; Master's degree from an accredited college/university preferred"
"Fluency in several programming languages such as Python, Java, or JavaScript, with the ability to pick up new languages and technologies quickly"
"Experience working within a Cloud Environment, Azure preferred"
"Proficiency with Git, Jira, Confluence and with Linux/Unix environments; proficiency with Agile software development"
"Strong written and verbal communication skills, ability to work in dynamic team environments and multi-task effectively"
"Big Data Sw Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at KPMG in Atlanta, GA"
"Big Data Sw Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and five (5) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering."
"Candidate should have a strong understanding of embedded systems, hardware design, digital logic design, and various hardware architectures."
"Experience working with at least one major FPGA vendor design tool suite (Xlinx ISE and/or Vivado, Altera Quartus Tool Suites, Microsemi Libero) and familiarity with standard FPGA design flow (Synthesis, Place and Route, Simulation, Timing Analysis, Floor Planning)"
"Competency designing hardware leveraging at least one industry standard HDL language (e.g. Verilog, System Verilog, VHDL)"
"Experience with verification and validation of hardware designs leveraging industry standard tools and methods (e.g. ModelSim, System Verilog, UVM, BFM’s)"
"Design experience with standard hardware interfaces, data flow (FIFOs, clock domain crossing), and bus protocols (e.g. AXI, AMBA)"
Experience with Octave/Python/MATLAB/Simulink for modeling digital signal processing blocks.
"Hands on experience with hardware testing, troubleshooting, and embedded hardware/software integration using general laboratory test equipment such as oscilloscopes, and logic analyzers."
"Experience with analog/digital circuit design, and PCB design and manufacturing"
"Experience with low-level (C/C++) programming and a high-level scripting language (e.g. Python, TCL)"
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
"Fpga Hardware Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Fpga Hardware Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related technical field of study and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related technical field of study and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related technical field of study and four (4) years of relevant full time experience."
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related technical field of study and eleven (11) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related technical field of study and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience."
5+ years professional experience in the machine learning domain.
Concurrent experience in cyber security and/or intelligence analysis domain is required.
Software development experience is required.
"Comprehensive knowledge of various AI and machine learning techniques, algorithms, and related development environments."
Demonstrated knowledge of cyber security and/or intelligence analysis issues and problems is also required.
Candidate must possess strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required.
Business development experience a major plus.
"Experience with machine learning development tools and techniques like Python, R, Matlab, Tensorflow, Caffe, etc. is a plus."
"Senior Machine Learning Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Machine Learning Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Facility with mathematics (linear algebra, probability and statistics, differential equations) and computer programming"
Ability to appraise imperfect data and adapt for modeling use
"Good oral and written communication skills; the role involves written expositions of models and their supporting research for both technical and general audiences, as well as presentations to business leaders and quant audiences"
Research experience in credit risk
"Familiarity with computing languages such as SAS, R, Python, and SQL"
"Thought leadership; the ability to find creative solutions to novel modeling problems, and to suggest improvements to existing solutions."
The ability to forge partnerships with businesses that result in more realistic and better models.
"Senior Quantitative Finance Analyst jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Bank of America in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Quantitative Finance Analyst salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Embedded systems applications, security, and trust"
Reconfigurable computing and programmable logic devices
Microelectronic hardware security
Custom CAD/EDA tools
Formal methods and verification
Real-time data processing and display
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and seven (7) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and nine (9) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor’s degree, or"
"A Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering and four (4) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of a Bachelor's degree."
"Experience with C++ or Python programming, and/or FPGA design"
Knowledge of graph theory/analytics/visualization or combinatorial mathematics
"Knowledge of EDA tools/development (e.g., Xilinx Vivado for FPGAs)"
"Senior Fpga Researcher jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Senior Fpga Researcher salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"A Bachelor's degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics."
"A Master’s degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics and three (3) years of relevant full-time experience after completion of that degree,"
"A Doctoral degree in Aerospace, Computer, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or Mathematics."
"System Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"System Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
"Develop and update test plans, procedures and report documentation."
Execute developed test procedures and document results in a formal setting.
Technically coordinate with a cross-functional team to develop test solutions for our DoD sponsor ensuring all products meet allocated requirements and design through formal testing.
"Maintain and create test scripts, files and data that support formal testing."
Work in an integrated product team and understand system and unit level requirements in order to create test plans and procedures.
"Utilize existing system specifications, interface definitions, and aircraft avionics in the development of test procedures."
Ensure that all technical work is performed and documented to appropriate professional standards.
Develop test estimates for proposed work and status current tasking.
"A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field of study."
Experience in test engineering processes and methodologies applicable to complex military systems development.
"Manual, ad hoc, black and white box testing."
"Strong collaboration, organization, teaming and communication abilities."
Ability to work well individually or in a group setting.
Ability to work under pressure and time constraints.
Ability to create and deliver technical presentations effectively.
Python or similar scripting language.
"Experience with MIL-STD-1553 data bus, avionics systems, Electronic Warfare systems, tactical data links, military radios, and open systems architectures."
Experience with system security and safety engineering.
Experience with configuration management and requirements management systems.
Experience directing small teams of employees as a task leader
"Test Engineer jobs in Atlanta, GA"
"Jobs at Georgia Tech Research Institute in Atlanta, GA"
"Test Engineer salaries in Atlanta, GA"
